Privacy Policy
Home
Privacy Policy
PRIVACY POLICY
Last updated Oct 04, 2023
This privacy notice for MishiPay Ltd (‘
we
‘, ‘
us
‘, or ‘
our
‘), describes how and why we might collect, store, use, and/or share (‘
process
‘) your information when you use our services (‘
Services
‘), such as when you:
Visit our website at
http://*mishipay.com
, or any website of ours that links to this privacy notice
Download and use our mobile application (MishiPay App, Scan & Go, Self-checkout Kiosk, Click & Collect ), or any other application of ours that links to this privacy notice
Engage with us in other related ways, including any sales, marketing, or events
Questions or concerns?
Reading this privacy notice will help you understand your privacy rights and choices. If you do not agree with our policies and practices, please do not use our Services. If you still have any questions or concerns, please contact us at
privacy@mishipay.com
or submit a
DSAR
.
SUMMARY OF KEY POINTS
This summary provides key points from our privacy notice, but you can find out more details about any of these topics by clicking the link following each key point or by using our table of contents below to find the section you are looking for.
What personal information do we process?
When you visit, use, or navigate our Services, we may process personal information depending on how you interact with us and the Services, the choices you make, and the products and features you use.
Do we process any sensitive personal information?
We do not process sensitive personal information.
Do we receive any information from third parties?
We do not receive any information from third parties.
How do we process your information?
We process your information to provide, improve, and administer our Services, communicate with you, for security and fraud prevention, and to comply with law. We may also process your information for other purposes with your consent. We process your information only when we have a valid legal reason to do so.
In what situations and with which types of parties do we share personal information?
We may share information in specific situations and with specific categories of third parties.
How do we keep your information safe?
We have organisational and technical processes and procedures in place to protect your personal information. However, no electronic transmission over the internet or information storage technology can be guaranteed to be 100% secure, so we cannot promise or guarantee that hackers, cybercriminals, or other unauthorised third parties will not be able to defeat our security and improperly collect, access, steal, or modify your information.
What are your rights?
Depending on where you are located geographically, the applicable privacy law may mean you have certain rights regarding your personal information.
How do you exercise your rights?
The easiest way to exercise your rights is by visiting
privacy@mishipay.com
, or by submitting
DSAR
. We will consider and act upon any request in accordance with applicable data protection laws.
TABLE OF CONTENTS
1. WHAT INFORMATION DO WE COLLECT?
2. HOW DO WE PROCESS YOUR INFORMATION?
3. WHAT LEGAL BASES DO WE RELY ON TO PROCESS YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION?
4. WHEN AND WITH WHOM DO WE SHARE YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION?
5. DO WE USE COOKIES AND OTHER TRACKING TECHNOLOGIES?
6. HOW DO WE HANDLE YOUR SOCIAL LOGINS?
7. HOW LONG DO WE KEEP YOUR INFORMATION?
8. HOW DO WE KEEP YOUR INFORMATION SAFE?
9. DO WE COLLECT INFORMATION FROM MINORS?
10. WHAT ARE YOUR PRIVACY RIGHTS?
11. CONTROLS FOR DO-NOT-TRACK FEATURES
12. DO CALIFORNIA RESIDENTS HAVE SPECIFIC PRIVACY RIGHTS?
13. DO VIRGINIA RESIDENTS HAVE SPECIFIC PRIVACY RIGHTS?
14. DO WE MAKE UPDATES TO THIS NOTICE?
15. HOW CAN YOU CONTACT US ABOUT THIS NOTICE?
16. HOW CAN YOU REVIEW, UPDATE, OR DELETE THE DATA WE COLLECT FROM YOU?
1. WHAT INFORMATION DO WE COLLECT?
Personal information you disclose to us
In Short:
We collect personal information that you provide to us.
We collect personal information that you voluntarily provide to us when you register on the Services, express an interest in obtaining information about us or our products and Services, when you participate in activities on the Services, or otherwise when you contact us.
Personal Information Provided by You.
The personal information that we collect depends on the context of your interactions with us and the Services, the choices you make, and the products and features you use. The personal information we collect may include the following:
names
phone numbers
email addresses
usernames
passwords
contact preferences
contact or authentication data
Sensitive Information.
We do not process sensitive information.
Payment Data.
We use third party gateway providers to process your payments, we will not have access to your full payment card information – these details will be received directly by our service providers. We will only receive the last four digits and the expiry date of your chosen payment card from our service provider for the purpose of facilitating registration of your payment card against your registered user profile in the MishiPay Service. All payment data is stored by Stripe, Adyen, QuickPay, Cybersource,
checkout.com
, Mashreqbank, SurePay, Moyaser, Aurus, Network International and Vivawallet. You may find their privacy notice link(s) here:
http://www.stripe.com/privacy
,
http://www.adyen.com/policies-and-disclaimer/privacy-policy
,
https://quickpay.net/terms-of-service/
,
https://usa.visa.com/legal/privacy-policy.html
,
https://www.checkout.com/legal/privacy-policy
,
https://www.mashreqbank.com/en/uae/personal/transparency/privacy-notice/
,
https://surepay.nl/privacy-statement/
,
https://moyasar.com/en/about/
,
https://www.aurusinc.com/aboutus#CSR
,
https://www.network.ae/en/contents/view/privacy-notice
and
https://www.vivawallet.com/privacy-policy
.
Social Media Login Data.
We may provide you with the option to register with us using your existing social media account details, like your Facebook, Twitter, or other social media account. If you choose to register in this way, we will collect the information described in the section called ‘HOW DO WE HANDLE YOUR SOCIAL LOGINS?’ below.
Application Data.
If you use our application(s), we also may collect the following information if you choose to provide us with access or permission:
Geolocation Information.
We may request access or permission to track location-based information from your mobile device, either continuously or while you are using our mobile application(s), to provide certain location-based services. If you wish to change our access or permissions, you may do so in your device’s settings.
Mobile Device Access.
We may request access or permission to certain features from your mobile device, including your mobile device’s camera, contacts, storage, phone, location, and other features. If you wish to change our access or permissions, you may do so in your device’s settings.
Mobile Device Data.
We automatically collect device information (such as your mobile device ID, model, and manufacturer), operating system, version information and system configuration information, device and application identification numbers, browser type and version, hardware model Internet service provider and/or mobile carrier, and Internet Protocol (IP) address (or proxy server). If you are using our application(s), we may also collect information about the phone network associated with your mobile device, your mobile device’s operating system or platform, the type of mobile device you use, your mobile device’s unique device ID, and information about the features of our application(s) you accessed.
This information is primarily needed to maintain the security and operation of our application(s), for troubleshooting, and for our internal analytics and reporting purposes.
All personal information that you provide to us must be true, complete, and accurate, and you must notify us of any changes to such personal information.
Information automatically collected
In Short:
Some information — such as your Internet Protocol (IP) address and/or browser and device characteristics — is collected automatically when you visit our Services.
We automatically collect certain information when you visit, use, or navigate the Services. This information does not reveal your specific identity (like your name or contact information) but may include device and usage information, such as your IP address, browser and device characteristics, operating system, language preferences, referring URLs, device name, country, location, information about how and when you use our Services, and other technical information. This information is primarily needed to maintain the security and operation of our Services, and for our internal analytics and reporting purposes.
Like many businesses, we also collect information through cookies and similar technologies. You can find out more about this in our Cookie Notice:
https://www.mishipay.com/cookie-policy
.
The information we collect includes:
Log and Usage Data.
Log and usage data is service-related, diagnostic, usage, and performance information our servers automatically collect when you access or use our Services and which we record in log files. Depending on how you interact with us, this log data may include your IP address, device information, browser type, and settings and information about your activity in the Services (such as the date/time stamps associated with your usage, pages and files viewed, searches, and other actions you take such as which features you use), device event information (such as system activity, error reports (sometimes called ‘crash dumps’), and hardware settings).
Device Data.
We collect device data such as information about your computer, phone, tablet, or other device you use to access the Services. Depending on the device used, this device data may include information such as your IP address (or proxy server), device and application identification numbers, location, browser type, hardware model, Internet service provider and/or mobile carrier, operating system, and system configuration information.
Location Data.
We collect location data such as information about your device’s location, which can be either precise or imprecise. How much information we collect depends on the type and settings of the device you use to access the Services. For example, we may use GPS and other technologies to collect geolocation data that tells us your current location (based on your IP address). You can opt out of allowing us to collect this information either by refusing access to the information or by disabling your Location setting on your device. However, if you choose to opt out, you may not be able to use certain aspects of the Services.
2. HOW DO WE PROCESS YOUR INFORMATION?
In Short:
We process your information to provide, improve, and administer our Services, communicate with you, for security and fraud prevention, and to comply with law. We may also process your information for other purposes with your consent.
We process your personal information for a variety of reasons, depending on how you interact with our Services, including:
To facilitate account creation and authentication and otherwise manage user accounts.
We may process your information so you can create and log in to your account, as well as keep your account in working order.
To deliver and facilitate delivery of services to the user.
We may process your information to provide you with the requested service.
To fulfil and manage your orders.
We may process your information to fulfil and manage your orders, payments, returns, and exchanges made through the Services.
To save or protect an individual’s vital interest.
We may process your information when necessary to save or protect an individual’s vital interest, such as to prevent harm.
3. WHAT LEGAL BASES DO WE RELY ON TO PROCESS YOUR INFORMATION?
In Short:
We only process your personal information when we believe it is necessary and we have a valid legal reason (i.e. legal basis) to do so under applicable law, like with your consent, to comply with laws, to provide you with services to enter into or fulfil our contractual obligations, to protect your rights, or to fulfil our legitimate business interests.
If you are located in the EU or UK, this section applies to you.
The General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR) and UK GDPR require us to explain the valid legal bases we rely on in order to process your personal information. As such, we may rely on the following legal bases to process your personal information:
Consent.
We may process your information if you have given us permission (i.e. consent) to use your personal information for a specific purpose. You can withdraw your consent at any time.
Performance of a Contract.
We may process your personal information when we believe it is necessary to fulfil our contractual obligations to you, including providing our Services or at your request prior to entering into a contract with you.
Legal Obligations.
We may process your information where we believe it is necessary for compliance with our legal obligations, such as to cooperate with a law enforcement body or regulatory agency, exercise or defend our legal rights, or disclose your information as evidence in litigation in which we are involved.
Vital Interests.
We may process your information where we believe it is necessary to protect your vital interests or the vital interests of a third party, such as situations involving potential threats to the safety of any person.
If you are located in Canada, this section applies to you.
We may process your information if you have given us specific permission (i.e. express consent) to use your personal information for a specific purpose, or in situations where your permission can be inferred (i.e. implied consent). You can withdraw your consent at any time.
In some exceptional cases, we may be legally permitted under applicable law to process your information without your consent, including, for example:
If collection is clearly in the interests of an individual and consent cannot be obtained in a timely way
For investigations and fraud detection and prevention
For business transactions provided certain conditions are met
If it is contained in a witness statement and the collection is necessary to assess, process, or settle an insurance claim
For identifying injured, ill, or deceased persons and communicating with next of kin
If we have reasonable grounds to believe an individual has been, is, or may be victim of financial abuse
If it is reasonable to expect collection and use with consent would compromise the availability or the accuracy of the information and the collection is reasonable for purposes related to investigating a breach of an agreement or a contravention of the laws of Canada or a province
If disclosure is required to comply with a subpoena, warrant, court order, or rules of the court relating to the production of records
If it was produced by an individual in the course of their employment, business, or profession and the collection is consistent with the purposes for which the information was produced
If the collection is solely for journalistic, artistic, or literary purposes
If the information is publicly available and is specified by the regulations
4. WHEN AND WITH WHOM DO WE SHARE YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION?
In Short:
We may share information in specific situations described in this section and/or with the following categories of third parties.
Vendors, Consultants, and Other Third-Party Service Providers.
We may share your data with third-party vendors, service providers, contractors, or agents (‘
third parties
‘) who perform services for us or on our behalf and require access to such information to do that work. The categories of third parties we may share personal information with are as follows:
Cloud Computing Services
Communication & Collaboration Tools
Data Analytics Services
Data Storage Service Providers
Payment Processors
Performance Monitoring Tools
Product Engineering & Design Tools
User Account Registration & Authentication Services
Website Hosting Service Providers
We also may  share your personal information in the following situations:
Business Transfers.
We may share or transfer your information in connection with, or during negotiations of, any merger, sale of company assets, financing, or acquisition of all or a portion of our business to another company.
Affiliates.
We may share your information with our affiliates, in which case we will require those affiliates to honour this privacy notice. Affiliates include our parent company and any subsidiaries, joint venture partners, or other companies that we control or that are under common control with us.
Customers.
We may share certain information about you with our customers (ie retail organisations) for whom we are providing the Services. This is to enable those customers both to assess how the Services are being performed and how they may improve the service which they offer to you. Any such sharing of information by us will only occur if we consider that proper safeguards are in place to protect the privacy of such information
5. DO WE USE COOKIES AND OTHER TRACKING TECHNOLOGIES?
In Short:
We may use cookies and other tracking technologies to collect and store your information.
We may use cookies and similar tracking technologies (like web beacons and pixels) to access or store information. Specific information about how we use such technologies and how you can refuse certain cookies is set out in our Cookie Notice:
http://www.mishipay.com/cookie-policy
.
6. HOW DO WE HANDLE YOUR SOCIAL LOGINS?
In Short:
If you choose to register or log in to our Services using a social media account, we may have access to certain information about you.
Our Services offer you the ability to register and log in using your third-party social media account details (like your Facebook or Twitter logins). Where you choose to do this, we will receive certain profile information about you from your social media provider. The profile information we receive may vary depending on the social media provider concerned, but will often include your name, email address, friends list, and profile picture, as well as other information you choose to make public on such a social media platform.
We will use the information we receive only for the purposes that are described in this privacy notice or that are otherwise made clear to you on the relevant Services. Please note that we do not control, and are not responsible for, other uses of your personal information by your third-party social media provider. We recommend that you review their privacy notice to understand how they collect, use, and share your personal information, and how you can set your privacy preferences on their sites and apps.
7. HOW LONG DO WE KEEP YOUR INFORMATION?
In Short:
We keep your information for as long as necessary to fulfil the purposes outlined in this privacy notice unless otherwise required by law.
We will only keep your personal information for as long as it is necessary for the purposes set out in this privacy notice, unless a longer retention period is required or permitted by law (such as tax, accounting, or other legal requirements). No purpose in this notice will require us keeping your personal information for longer than twenty six (26) months past the termination of the merchant’s account.
When we have no ongoing legitimate business need to process your personal information, we will either delete or anonymise such information, or, if this is not possible (for example, because your personal information has been stored in backup archives), then we will securely store your personal information and isolate it from any further processing until deletion is possible.
IS YOUR INFORMATION TRANSFERRED INTERNATIONALLY?
In Short:
We may transfer, store, and process your information in countries other than your own.
Our servers are located in the United Kingdom and USA
. If you are accessing our Services from outside
the United Kingdom
, please be aware that your information may be transferred to, stored, and processed by us in our facilities and by those third parties with whom we may share your personal information
in
India, and other countries.
If you are a resident in the European Economic Area (EEA), United Kingdom (UK), or Switzerland, then these countries may not necessarily have data protection laws or other similar laws as comprehensive as those in your country. However, we will take all necessary measures to protect your personal information in accordance with this privacy notice and applicable law.
European Commission’s Standard Contractual Clauses and
International Data Transfer Agreement:
We have implemented measures to protect your personal information, including by using the European Commission’s Standard Contractual Clauses and ICO UK’s approved  International Data Transfer Agreement  for transfers of personal information between our group companies and between us and our third-party providers. These clauses require all recipients to protect all personal information that they process originating from the EEA or UK in accordance with European data protection laws and regulations. We have implemented similar appropriate safeguards with our third-party service providers and partners and further details can be provided upon request.
8. HOW DO WE KEEP YOUR INFORMATION SAFE?
In Short:
We aim to protect your personal information through a system of organisational and technical security measures.
We have implemented appropriate and reasonable technical and organisational security measures designed to protect the security of any personal information we process. However, despite our safeguards and efforts to secure your information, no electronic transmission over the Internet or information storage technology can be guaranteed to be 100% secure, so we cannot promise or guarantee that hackers, cybercriminals, or other unauthorised third parties will not be able to defeat our security and improperly collect, access, steal, or modify your information. Although we will do our best to protect your personal information, transmission of personal information to and from our Services is at your own risk. You should only access the Services within a secure environment.
9. DO WE COLLECT INFORMATION FROM MINORS?
In Short:
We do not knowingly collect data from or market to minors.
The use of the MishiPay Service is exclusively intended for individuals who have attained the age of 16 or above. If you are below the age of 16, you are not granted the necessary authorization to utilize this App. Hence, we kindly request that you abstain from using this App without the presence and supervision of an adult.
10. WHAT ARE YOUR PRIVACY RIGHTS?
In Short:
In some regions, such as the European Economic Area (EEA), United Kingdom (UK), and Canada, you have rights that allow you greater access to and control over your personal information. You may review, change, or terminate your account at any time.
In some regions (like the EEA, UK, and Canada), you have certain rights under applicable data protection laws. These may include the right (i) to request access and obtain a copy of your personal information, (ii) to request rectification or erasure; (iii) to restrict the processing of your personal information; and (iv) if applicable, to data portability. In certain circumstances, you may also have the right to object to the processing of your personal information. You can make such a request by contacting us by using the contact details provided in the section ‘HOW CAN YOU CONTACT US ABOUT THIS NOTICE?’ below.
We will consider and act upon any request in accordance with applicable data protection laws.
If you are located in the EEA or UK and you believe we are unlawfully processing your personal information, you also have the right to complain to your
Member State data protection authority
or
UK data protection authority
.
If you are located in Switzerland, you may contact the
Federal Data Protection and Information Commissioner
.
Withdrawing your consent:
If we are relying on your consent to process your personal information, which may be express and/or implied consent depending on the applicable law, you have the right to withdraw your consent at any time. You can withdraw your consent at any time by contacting us by using the contact details provided in the section ‘HOW CAN YOU CONTACT US ABOUT THIS NOTICE?’ below.
However, please note that this will not affect the lawfulness of the processing before its withdrawal nor, when applicable law allows, will it affect the processing of your personal information conducted in reliance on lawful processing grounds other than consent.
Account Information
If you would at any time like to review or change the information in your account or terminate your account, you can:
Contact us using the contact information provided.
Log in to your account settings and update your user account.
Upon your request to terminate your account, we will deactivate or delete your account and information from our active databases. However, we may retain some information in our files to prevent fraud, troubleshoot problems, assist with any investigations, enforce our legal terms and/or comply with applicable legal requirements.
Cookies and similar technologies:
Most Web browsers are set to accept cookies by default. If you prefer, you can usually choose to set your browser to remove cookies and to reject cookies. If you choose to remove cookies or reject cookies, this could affect certain features or services of our Services. For further information, please see our Cookie Notice:
https://www.mishipay.com/cookie-policy
.
If you have questions or comments about your privacy rights, you may email us at
privacy@mishipay.com
.
11. CONTROLS FOR DO-NOT-TRACK FEATURES
Most web browsers and some mobile operating systems and mobile applications include a Do-Not-Track (‘DNT’) feature or setting you can activate to signal your privacy preference not to have data about your online browsing activities monitored and collected. At this stage no uniform technology standard for recognising and implementing DNT signals has been finalised. As such, we do not currently respond to DNT browser signals or any other mechanism that automatically communicates your choice not to be tracked online. If a standard for online tracking is adopted that we must follow in the future, we will inform you about that practice in a revised version of this privacy notice.
12. DO CALIFORNIA RESIDENTS HAVE SPECIFIC PRIVACY RIGHTS?
In Short:
Yes, if you are a resident of California, you are granted specific rights regarding access to your personal information.
California Civil Code Section 1798.83, also known as the ‘Shine The Light’ law, permits our users who are California residents to request and obtain from us, once a year and free of charge, information about categories of personal information (if any) we disclosed to third parties for direct marketing purposes and the names and addresses of all third parties with which we shared personal information in the immediately preceding calendar year. If you are a California resident and would like to make such a request, please submit your request in writing to us using the contact information provided below.
If you are under 18 years of age, reside in California, and have a registered account with Services, you have the right to request removal of unwanted data that you publicly post on the Services. To request removal of such data, please contact us using the contact information provided below and include the email address associated with your account and a statement that you reside in California. We will make sure the data is not publicly displayed on the Services, but please be aware that the data may not be completely or comprehensively removed from all our systems (e.g. backups, etc.).
CCPA Privacy Notice
The California Code of Regulations defines a ‘resident’ as:
(1) every individual who is in the State of California for other than a temporary or transitory purpose and
(2) every individual who is domiciled in the State of California who is outside the State of California for a temporary or transitory purpose
All other individuals are defined as ‘non-residents’.
If this definition of ‘resident’ applies to you, we must adhere to certain rights and obligations regarding your personal information.
What categories of personal information do we collect?
We have collected the following categories of personal information in the past twelve (12) months:
Category
Examples
Collected
A. Identifiers
Contact details, such as real name, alias, postal address, telephone or mobile contact number, unique personal identifier, online identifier, Internet Protocol address, email address, and account name
YES
B. Personal information categories listed in the California Customer Records statute
Name, contact information, education, employment, employment history, and financial information
YES
C. Protected classification characteristics under California or federal law
Gender and date of birth
NO
D. Commercial information
Transaction information, purchase history, financial details, and payment information
NO
E. Biometric information
Fingerprints and voiceprints
NO
F. Internet or other similar network activity
Browsing history, search history, online behaviour, interest data, and interactions with our and other websites, applications, systems, and advertisements
NO
G. Geolocation data
Device location
YES
H. Audio, electronic, visual, thermal, olfactory, or similar information
Images and audio, video or call recordings created in connection with our business activities
NO
I. Professional or employment-related information
Business contact details in order to provide you our Services at a business level or job title, work history, and professional qualifications if you apply for a job with us
NO
J. Education Information
Student records and directory information
NO
K. Inferences drawn from other personal information
Inferences drawn from any of the collected personal information listed above to create a profile or summary about, for example, an individual’s preferences and characteristics
NO
L. Sensitive Personal Information
NO
We will use and retain the collected personal information as needed to provide the Services or for:
Category A – 26 months after the merchant contract is terminated
Category B – 26 months after the merchant contract is terminated
Category G – 26 months after the merchant contract is terminated
We may also collect other personal information outside of these categories through instances where you interact with us in person, online, or by phone or mail in the context of:
Receiving help through our customer support channels;
Participation in customer surveys or contests; and
Facilitation in the delivery of our Services and to respond to your inquiries.
How do we use and share your personal information?
More information about our data collection and sharing practices can be found in this privacy notice and our Cookie Notice:
https://www.mishipay.com/cookie-policy
You may contact us by email at
privacy@mishipay.com
, or by referring to the contact details at the bottom of this document.
If you are using an authorised agent to exercise your right to opt out we may deny a request if the authorised agent does not submit proof that they have been validly authorised to act on your behalf.
Will your information be shared with anyone else?
We may disclose your personal information with our service providers pursuant to a written contract between us and each service provider. Each service provider is a for-profit entity that processes the information on our behalf, following the same strict privacy protection obligations mandated by the CCPA.
We may use your personal information for our own business purposes, such as for undertaking internal research for technological development and demonstration. This is not considered to be ‘selling’ of your personal information.
We have not sold or shared any personal information to third parties for a business or commercial purpose in the preceding twelve (12) months. We have disclosed the following categories of personal information to third parties for a business or commercial purpose in the preceding twelve (12) months:
The categories of third parties to whom we disclosed personal information for a business or commercial purpose can be found under ‘WHEN AND WITH WHOM DO WE SHARE YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION?’.
Your rights with respect to your personal data
Right to request deletion of the data — Request to delete
You can ask for the deletion of your personal information. If you ask us to delete your personal information, we will respect your request and delete your personal information, subject to certain exceptions provided by law, such as (but not limited to) the exercise by another consumer of his or her right to free speech, our compliance requirements resulting from a legal obligation, or any processing that may be required to protect against illegal activities.
Right to be informed — Request to know
Depending on the circumstances, you have a right to know:
whether we collect and use your personal information;
the categories of personal information that we collect;
the purposes for which the collected personal information is used;
whether we sell or share personal information to third parties;
the categories of personal information that we sold, shared, or disclosed for a business purpose;
the categories of third parties to whom the personal information was sold, shared, or disclosed for a business purpose;
the business or commercial purpose for collecting, selling, or sharing personal information; and
the specific pieces of personal information we collected about you.
In accordance with applicable law, we are not obligated to provide or delete consumer information that is de-identified in response to a consumer request or to re-identify individual data to verify a consumer request.
Right to Non-Discrimination for the Exercise of a Consumer’s Privacy Rights
We will not discriminate against you if you exercise your privacy rights.
Right to Limit Use and Disclosure of Sensitive Personal Information
We do not process consumer’s sensitive personal information.
Verification process
Upon receiving your request, we will need to verify your identity to determine you are the same person about whom we have the information in our system. These verification efforts require us to ask you to provide information so that we can match it with information you have previously provided us. For instance, depending on the type of request you submit, we may ask you to provide certain information so that we can match the information you provide with the information we already have on file, or we may contact you through a communication method (e.g. phone or email) that you have previously provided to us. We may also use other verification methods as the circumstances dictate.
We will only use personal information provided in your request to verify your identity or authority to make the request. To the extent possible, we will avoid requesting additional information from you for the purposes of verification. However, if we cannot verify your identity from the information already maintained by us, we may request that you provide additional information for the purposes of verifying your identity and for security or fraud-prevention purposes. We will delete such additionally provided information as soon as we finish verifying you.
Other privacy rights
You may object to the processing of your personal information.
You may request correction of your personal data if it is incorrect or no longer relevant, or ask to restrict the processing of the information.
You can designate an authorised agent to make a request under the CCPA on your behalf. We may deny a request from an authorised agent that does not submit proof that they have been validly authorised to act on your behalf in accordance with the CCPA.
You may request to opt out from future selling or sharing of your personal information to third parties. Upon receiving an opt-out request, we will act upon the request as soon as feasibly possible, but no later than fifteen (15) days from the date of the request submission.
To exercise these rights, you can contact us by email at
privacy@mishipay.com
, or by submitting
DSAR
. If you have a complaint about how we handle your data, we would like to hear from you.
13. DO VIRGINIA RESIDENTS HAVE SPECIFIC PRIVACY RIGHTS?
In Short:
Yes, if you are a resident of Virginia, you may be granted specific rights regarding access to and use of your personal information.
Virginia CDPA Privacy Notice
Under the Virginia Consumer Data Protection Act (CDPA):
‘Consumer’ means a natural person who is a resident of the Commonwealth acting only in an individual or household context. It does not include a natural person acting in a commercial or employment context.
‘Personal data’ means any information that is linked or reasonably linkable to an identified or identifiable natural person. ‘Personal data’ does not include de-identified data or publicly available information.
‘Sale of personal data’ means the exchange of personal data for monetary consideration.
If this definition ‘consumer’ applies to you, we must adhere to certain rights and obligations regarding your personal data.
The information we collect, use, and disclose about you will vary depending on how you interact with us and our Services. To find out more, please visit the following sections:
Personal data we collect
How we use your personal data
When and with whom we share your personal data
Your rights with respect to your personal data
Right to be informed whether or not we are processing your personal data
Right to access your personal data
Right to correct inaccuracies in your personal data
Right to request deletion of your personal data
Right to obtain a copy of the personal data you previously shared with us
Right to opt out of the processing of your personal data if it is used for targeted advertising, the sale of personal data, or profiling in furtherance of decisions that produce legal or similarly significant effects (‘profiling’)
We have not sold any personal data to third parties for business or commercial purposes. We will not sell personal data in the future belonging to website visitors, users, and other consumers.
Exercise your rights provided under the Virginia CDPA
More information about our data collection and sharing practices can be found in this privacy notice and our Cookie Notice:
https://www.mishipay.com/cookie-policy.
You may contact us by email at privacy@mishipay.com, by submitting
DSAR
or by referring to the contact details at the bottom of this document.
If you are using an authorised agent to exercise your rights, we may deny a request if the authorised agent does not submit proof that they have been validly authorised to act on your behalf.
Verification process
We may request that you provide additional information reasonably necessary to verify you and your consumer’s request. If you submit the request through an authorised agent, we may need to collect additional information to verify your identity before processing your request.
Upon receiving your request, we will respond without undue delay, but in all cases, within forty-five (45) days of receipt. The response period may be extended once by forty-five (45) additional days when reasonably necessary. We will inform you of any such extension within the initial 45-day response period, together with the reason for the extension.
Right to appeal
If we decline to take action regarding your request, we will inform you of our decision and reasoning behind it. If you wish to appeal our decision, please email us at
privacy@mishipay.com
. Within sixty (60) days of receipt of an appeal, we will inform you in writing of any action taken or not taken in response to the appeal, including a written explanation of the reasons for the decisions. If your appeal if denied, you may contact the
Attorney General to submit a complaint
.
DO OTHER REGIONS HAVE SPECIFIC PRIVACY RIGHTS?
In Short:
You may have additional rights based on the country you reside in.
Australia
We collect and process your personal information under the obligations and conditions set by Australia’s Privacy Act 1988 (Privacy Act).
This privacy notice satisfies the notice requirements defined in the Privacy Act, in particular: what personal information we collect from you, from which sources, for which purposes, and other recipients of your personal information.
If you do not wish to provide the personal information necessary to fulfill their applicable purpose, it may affect our ability to provide our services, in particular:
offer you the products or services that you want
respond to or help with your requests
manage your account with us
confirm your identity and protect your account
At any time, you have the right to request access to or correction of your personal information. You can make such a request by contacting us by using the contact details provided in the section ‘HOW CAN YOU REVIEW, UPDATE, OR DELETE THE DATA WE COLLECT FROM YOU?’
I
f you believe we are unlawfully processing your personal information, you have the right to submit a complaint about a breach of the Australian Privacy Principles to the
Office of the Australian Information Commissioner
.
14. DO WE MAKE UPDATES TO THIS NOTICE?
In Short:
Yes, we will update this notice as necessary to stay compliant with relevant laws.
We may update this privacy notice from time to time. The updated version will be indicated by an updated ‘Revised’ date and the updated version will be effective as soon as it is accessible. If we make material changes to this privacy notice, we may notify you either by prominently posting a notice of such changes or by directly sending you a notification. We encourage you to review this privacy notice frequently to be informed of how we are protecting your information.
15. HOW CAN YOU CONTACT US ABOUT THIS NOTICE?
If you have questions or comments about this notice, you may contact our Data Protection Officer (DPO), Nandan Yadav, by email at privacy@mishipay.com, or contact us by post at:
MishiPay Ltd
DPO
125 Kingsway
London, London WC2B 6NH
United Kingdom
16. HOW CAN YOU REVIEW, UPDATE, OR DELETE THE DATA WE COLLECT FROM YOU?
Based on the applicable laws of your country, you may have the right to request access to the personal information we collect from you, change that information, or delete it. To request to review, update, or delete your personal information, please email:
privacy@mishipay.com
or DSAR.
Learn how attractions use Mishipay’s checkout solution to enhance customer experience.
Know More
Like this:
Like
Loading...
%d
Sub-section Policy: 
Sub-policy 0
https://www.stripe.com/privacy:
Stripe Services Agreement
Stripe Connected Account Agreement
Stripe Payments Company Terms
Acquirer Terms
Acquirer Disclosure
Cross River Bank
Deutsche Bank
Goldman Sachs Bank USA
PNC Bank
Issuing Bank Terms
Payment Method Terms
User Bank Debit Authorizations
Prohibited & Restricted Businesses
Other Products and Programs
Stripe Terminal Device EULA
Stripe Terminal Purchase Terms
Stripe Terminal Reseller Terms
Stripe Atlas Agreement
Stripe Climate Contribution Terms
Stripe Partner Ecosystem
Stripe Apps
App Developer Agreement
App Marketplace Agreement
Privacy
Privacy Policy
Cookies Policy
Privacy Shield Policy
Service Providers List
Data Processing Agreement
Data Transfers Addendum
Stripe Privacy Center
Intellectual Property
Intellectual Property Notice
Marks Usage
E-SIGN Disclosure
Licenses
Consumer Terms
Last updated: January 16, 2025
This Privacy Policy includes important information about your personal data and we encourage you to read it carefully.
Welcome
We provide financial infrastructure for the internet. Individuals and businesses of all sizes use our technology and services to facilitate purchases, accept payments, send payouts, and manage online businesses.
This Privacy Policy (“Policy”) describes the Personal Data that we collect, how we use and share it, and details on how you can reach us with privacy-related inquiries. The Policy also outlines your rights and choices as a data subject, including the right to object to certain uses of your Personal Data.
Depending on the activity, Stripe assumes the role of a “data controller” and/or “data processor” (or “service provider”). For more details about our privacy practices, including our role, the specific Stripe entity responsible under this Policy, and our legal bases for processing your Personal Data, please visit our
Privacy Center
.
Defined Terms
In this Policy, “Stripe”, “we”, “our,” or “us” refers to the Stripe entity responsible for the collection, use, and handling of Personal Data as described in this document. Depending on your jurisdiction, the specific Stripe entity accountable for your Personal Data might vary.
Learn More
.
“Personal Data” refers to any information associated with an identified or identifiable individual, which can include data that you provide to us, and that we collect about you during your interaction with our Services (such as device information, IP address, etc.).
“Services” refers to the products, services, devices, and applications, that we provide under the Stripe Services Agreement (“Business Services”) or the Stripe Consumer Terms of Service (“End User Services”); websites (“Sites”) like Stripe.com and Link.com; and other Stripe applications and online services. We provide Business Services to entities (“Business Users”). We provide End User Services directly to individuals for their personal use.
“Financial Partners” are financial institutions, banks, and other partners such as payment method acquirers, payout providers, and card networks that we partner with to provide the Services.
Depending on the context, “you” might be an End Customer, End User, Representative, or Visitor:
End Users.
When you use an End User Service, such as saving a payment method with Link, for personal use we refer to you as an “End User.”
End Customers.
When you are not directly transacting with Stripe, but we receive your Personal Data to provide Services to a Business User, including when you make a purchase from a Business User on a Stripe Checkout page or receive payments from a Business User, we refer to you as an “End Customer.”
Representatives.
When you are acting on behalf of an existing or potential Business User—perhaps as a company founder, account administrator for a Business User, or a recipient of an employee credit card from a Business User via Stripe Issuing—we refer to you as a “Representative.”
Visitors.
When you interact with Stripe by visiting a Site without being logged into a Stripe account, or when your interaction with Stripe does not involve you being an End User, End Customer, or Representative, we refer to you as a “Visitor.” For example, you are a Visitor when you send a message to Stripe asking for more information about our Services.
In this Policy, “Transaction Data” refers to data collected and used by Stripe to facilitate transactions you request. Some Transaction Data is Personal Data and may include: your name, email address, contact number, billing and shipping address, payment method information (like credit or debit card number, bank account details, or payment card image chosen by you), merchant and location details, amount and date of purchase, and in some instances, information about what was purchased.
1. Personal Data that we collect and how we use and share it
2. More ways we collect, use and share Personal Data
3. Legal bases for processing data
4. Your rights and choices
5. Security and retention
6. International data transfers
7. Updates and notifications
8. Jurisdiction-specific provisions
9. Contact us
10. US Consumer Privacy Notice
1. Personal Data we collect and how we use and share it
Our collection and use of Personal Data differs based on whether you are an End User, End Customer, Representative, or Visitor, and the specific Service that you are using. For example, if you're a sole proprietor who wants to use our Business Services, we may collect your Personal Data to onboard your business; at the same time, you might also be an End Customer if you've bought goods from another Business User that is using our Services for payment processing. You could also be an End User if you used our End User Service, such as Link, for those transactions.
1.1 End Users
We provide End User Services when we provide the Services directly to you for your personal use (e.g., Link). Additional details regarding our collection, usage, and sharing of End User Personal Data, including the
legal bases
we rely on for processing such data, can be found in our
Privacy Center
.
a. Personal Data we collect about End Users
Using Link or Connecting your bank account
. Stripe offers a service called "Link," which allows you to create an account and store information for future interactions with Stripe’s Services and Business Users. You may save a number of different kinds of Personal Data using Link. For instance, you may save your name, payment method details, contact information, and address to conveniently use saved information to pay for transactions across our Business Users. When you choose to pay with Link, we will also collect Transaction Data associated with your transactions.
Learn More
.
You can also share and save bank account details to your Link account using Stripe’s
Financial Connections
product. When you use Financial Connections, Stripe will periodically collect and process your account information (such as bank account owner information, account balances, account number and details, account transactions, and, in some cases, log-in credentials). You can ask us to cease the collection of such data at any time.
Learn More
.
Finally, you can use Link to store your identity documents (such as your driver’s license) so that you can share them in future interactions with Stripe or its Business Users.
Paying Stripe
. When you purchase goods or services directly from Stripe, we receive your Transaction Data. For instance, when you make a payment to Stripe Climate, we collect information about the transaction, as well as your contact and payment method details.
Identity/Verification Services
. We offer an identity verification service that automates the comparison of your identity document (such as a driver’s license) with your image (such as a selfie). You can separately consent to us using your biometric data to enhance our verification technology, with the option to revoke your consent at any time.
Learn More
.
More
. For further information about other types of Personal Data that we may collect about End Users, including about your online activity and your engagement with our End User Services, please see the
More ways we collect, use, and share Personal Data
section below.
b. How we use and share Personal Data of End Users
Services
. We use and share your Personal Data to provide the End User Services to you, which includes support, personalization (such as language preferences and setting choices), and communication about our End User Services (such as communicating Policy updates and information about our Services). For example, Stripe may use cookies and similar technologies or the data you provide to our Business Users (such as when you input your email address on a Business User’s website) to recognize you and help you use Link when visiting our Business User’s website. Learn more about how we use cookies and similar technologies in Stripe’s
Cookie Policy
.
Our Business Users.
When you use Link to make payments with our Business Users, we share your Personal Data, including name, contact information, payment method details, and Transaction Data with those Business Users.
Learn More
. You can also direct Stripe to share your saved bank account information and identity documents with Business Users you do business with. Once we share your Personal Data with Business Users, we may process that Personal Data as a Data Processor for those Business Users, as detailed in Section 1.2 of this Policy.  You should consult the privacy policies of the Business Users’ you do business with for information on how they use the information shared with them.
Fraud Detection and Loss Prevention
. We use your Personal Data collected across our Services to detect fraud and prevent financial losses for you, us, and our Business Users and Financial Partners, including detecting unauthorized purchases. We may provide Business Users and Financial Partners, including those that use our fraud prevention-related Business Services (such as Stripe Radar), with Personal Data about you (including your attempted transactions) so that they can assess the fraud or loss risk associated with the transaction. Learn more about how we may use technology to assess the fraud risk associated with an attempted transaction and what information we share with Business Users and Financial Partners
here
and
here
.
Advertising
. Where permitted by applicable law, we may use your Personal Data, including Transaction Data, to assess your eligibility for, and offer you, other End User Services or promote existing End User Services, including through co-marketing with partners such as Stripe Business Users.
Learn more
. Subject to applicable law, including any consent requirements, we use and share End User Personal Data with third party partners to allow us to advertise our End User Services to you, including through interest-based advertising, and to track the efficacy of such ads. We do not transfer your Personal Data to third parties in exchange for payment, but we may provide your data to third-party partners, such as advertising partners, analytics providers, and social networks, who assist us in advertising our Services to you.
Learn more
.
More
. For further information about ways we may use and share End Users' Personal Data, please see the
More ways we collect, use, and share Personal Data
section below.
1.2 End Customers
Stripe provides various Business Services to our Business Users, which include processing in-person or online payments or payouts for those Business Users. When acting as a service provider—also referred to as a Data Processor—for a Business User, we process End Customer Personal Data in accordance with our agreement with the Business User and the Business User's lawful instructions. This happens, for example, when we process a payment for a Business User because you purchased a product from them, or when the Business User asks us to send you funds.
Business Users are responsible for ensuring that the privacy rights of their End Customers are respected, including obtaining appropriate consents and making disclosures about their own data collection and use associated with their products and services. If you're an End Customer, please refer to the privacy policy of the Business User you're doing business with for its privacy practices, choices, and controls.
We provide more comprehensive information about our collection, use, and sharing of End Customer Personal Data in our
Privacy Center
, including the
legal bases
we rely on for processing your Personal Data.
a. Personal Data we collect about End Customers
Transaction Data
. If you're an End Customer making payments to, receiving refunds or payments from, initiating a purchase or donation, or otherwise transacting with our Business User, whether in-person or online, we receive your Transaction Data. We may also receive your transaction history with the Business User.
Learn More
. Additionally, we may collect information entered into a checkout form even if you opt not to complete the form or transaction with the Business User.
Learn More
. A Business User who uses Stripe’s Terminal Service to provide its goods or services to End Customers may use the Terminal Service to collect End Customer Personal Data (like your name, email, phone number, address, signature, or age) in accordance with its own privacy policy.
Identity/Verification Information
. Stripe provides a verification and fraud prevention Service that our Business Users can use to verify Personal Data about you, such as your authorization to use a particular payment method. During the process, you’d be asked to share with us certain Personal Data (like your government ID and selfie for biometric verification, Personal Data you input, or Personal Data that is apparent from the physical payment method like a credit card image). To protect against fraud and determine if somebody is trying to impersonate you, we may cross-verify this data with information about you that we've collected from Business Users, Financial Partners, business affiliates, identity verification services, publicly available sources, and other third party service providers and sources.
Learn More
.
More
. For further information about other types of Personal Data that we may collect about End Customers, including about your online activity, please see the
More ways we collect, use, and share Personal Data
section below.
b. How we use and share Personal Data of End Customers
To provide our Business Services to our Business Users, we use and share End Customers' Personal Data with them. Where allowed, we also use End Customers' Personal Data for Stripe’s own purposes such as enhancing security, improving and offering our Business Services, and preventing fraud, loss, and other damages, as described further below.
Payment processing and accounting
. We use your Transaction Data to deliver Payment-related Business Services to Business Users — including online payment transactions processing, sales tax calculation, and invoice, bill, and dispute handling — and to help them determine their revenue, settle their bills, and execute accounting tasks.
Learn More
. We may also use your Personal Data to provide and improve our Business Services.
During payment transactions, your Personal Data is shared with various entities in connection with your transaction. As a service provider or data processor, we share Personal Data to enable transactions as directed by Business Users. For instance, when you choose a payment method for your transaction, we may share your Transaction Data with your bank or other payment method provider, including as necessary to authenticate you, Learn More, process your transaction, prevent fraud, and handle disputes. The Business User you choose to do business with also receives Transaction Data and might share the data with others. Please review your merchant’s, bank’s, and payment method provider’s privacy policies for more information about how they use and share your Personal Data.
Financial services
. Certain Business Users leverage our Services to offer financial services to you via Stripe or our Financial Partners. For example, a Business User may issue a card product with which you can purchase goods and services. Such cards could carry the brand of Stripe, the bank partner, and/or the Business User. In addition to any Transaction Data we may generate or receive when these cards are used for purchases, we also collect and use your Personal Data to provide and manage these products, including assisting our Business Users in preventing misuse of the cards. Please review the privacy policies of the Business User and, if applicable, our bank partners associated with the financial service (the brands of which may be shown on the card) for more information.
Identity/Verification services
. We use Personal Data about your identity to perform verification services for Stripe or for the Business Users that you are transacting with, to prevent fraud, and to enhance security. For these purposes we may use Personal Data you provide directly or Personal Data we obtain from our service providers, including for phone verification.
Learn More
. If you provide a selfie along with an image of your identity document, we may employ biometric technology to compare and calculate whether they match and verify your identity.
Learn More
.
Fraud detection and loss prevention.
We use your Personal Data collected across our Services to detect and prevent losses for you, us, our Business Users, and Financial Partners. We may provide Business Users and Financial Partners, including those using our fraud prevention-related Business Services, with your Personal Data (including your attempted transactions) to help them assess the fraud or loss risk associated with a transaction. Learn more about how we may use technology to assess the fraud risk associated with an attempted transaction and what information we share with Business Users and Financial Partners
here
and
here
.
Our Business Users (and their authorized third parties).
We share End Customers' Personal Data with their respective Business Users and parties directly authorized by those Business Users to receive such data. Here are common examples of such sharing:
When a Business User instructs Stripe to provide another Business User with access to its Stripe account, including data related to its End Customers, via Stripe Connect.
Sharing information that you have provided to us with a Business User so that we can send payments to you on behalf of that Business User.
Sharing information, documents, or images provided by an End Customer with a Business User when the latter uses Stripe Identity, our identity verification Service, to verify the identity of the End Customer.
The Business Users you choose to do business with may further share your Personal Data with third parties (like additional third party service providers other than Stripe). Please review the Business User’s privacy policy for more information.
Advertising by Business Users
. If you initiate a purchasing process with a Business User, the Business User receives your Personal Data from us in connection with our provision of Services even if you don't finish your purchase. The Business User may use your Personal Data to market and advertise their products or services, subject to the terms of their privacy policy. Please review the Business User’s privacy policy for more information, including your rights to stop their use of your Personal Data for marketing purposes.
More
. For further information about additional ways by which we may use and share End Customers' Personal Data, please see the
More ways we collect, use, and share Personal Data
section below.
1.3 Representatives
We collect, use, and share Personal Data from Representatives of Business Users (for example, business owners) to provide our Business Services. For more information about how we collect, use, and share Personal Data from Representatives, as well as the
legal bases
we rely on for processing such Personal Data, please visit our
Privacy Center
.
a. Personal Data we collect about Representatives
Registration and contact information
. When you register for a Stripe account for a Business User (including incorporation of a Business), we collect your name and login credentials. If you register for or attend an event organized by Stripe or sign up to receive Stripe communications, we collect your registration and profile data. As a Representative, we may collect your Personal Data from third parties, including data providers, to advertise, market, and communicate with you as detailed further in the
More ways we collect, use, and share Personal Data
section below. We may also link a location with you to tailor the Services or information effectively to your needs.
Learn More
.
Identification Information
. As a current or potential Business User, an owner of a Business User, or a shareholder, officer, or director of a Business User, we need your contact details, such as name, postal address, telephone number, and email address, to fulfill our Financial Partner and regulatory requirements, verify your identity, and prevent fraudulent activities and harm to the Stripe platform. We collect your Personal Data, such as ownership interest in the Business User, date of birth, government-issued identity documents, and associated identifiers, as well as any history of fraud or misuse, directly from you and/or from publicly available sources, third parties such as credit bureaus and via the Services we provide.
Learn More
. You may also choose to provide us with bank account information.
More
. For further information about other types of Personal Data that we may collect about Representatives, including your online activity, please see the
More ways we collect, use, and share Personal Data
section below.
b. How we use and share Personal Data of Representatives
We typically use the Personal Data of Representatives to provide the Business Services to the corresponding Business Users. The ways we use and share this data are further described below.
Business Services
. We use and share Representatives’ Personal Data with Business Users to provide the Services requested by you or the Business User you represent.
In some instances, we may have to submit your Personal Data to a government entity to provide our Business Services, for purposes such as the incorporation of a business, or calculating and paying applicable sales tax. For our tax-related Business Services, we may use your Personal Data to prepare tax documents and file taxes on behalf of the Business User you represent. For our Atlas business incorporation Services, we may use your Personal Data to submit forms to the IRS on your behalf and file documents with other government authorities, such as articles of incorporation in your state of incorporation.
We share Representatives’ Personal Data with parties authorized by the corresponding Business User, such as Financial Partners servicing a financial product, or third party apps or services the Business User chooses to use alongside our Business Services. Here are common examples of such sharing:
Payment method providers, like Visa or WeChat Pay, require information about Business Users and their Representatives who accept their payment methods. This information is typically required during the onboarding process or for processing transactions and handling disputes for these Business Users.
Learn More
.
A Business User may authorize Stripe to share your Personal Data with other Business Users to facilitate the provision of Services through Stripe Connect.
The use of Personal Data by a third party authorized by a Business User is subject to the third party’s privacy policy.
If you are a Business User who has chosen a name that includes Personal Data (for example, a sole proprietorship or family name in a company name), we will use and share such information for the provision of our Services in the same way we do with any company name. This may include, for example, displaying it on receipts and other transaction-identifying descriptions.
Fraud detection and loss prevention
. We use Representatives’ Personal Data to identify and manage risks that our Business Services might be used for fraudulent activities causing losses to Stripe, End Users, End Customers, Business Users, Financial Partners, and others. We also use information about you obtained from publicly available sources, third parties like credit bureaus and from our Services to address such risks, including to identify patterns of misuse and monitor for terms of service violations. Stripe may share Representatives' Personal Data with Business Users, our Financial Partners, and third party service providers, including phone verification providers,
Learn More
, to verify the information provided by you and identify risk indicators.
Learn More
. We also use and share Representatives' Personal Data to conduct due diligence, including conducting anti-money laundering and sanctions screening in accordance with applicable law.
Advertising
. Where permitted by applicable law, and where required with your consent, we use and share Representatives’ Personal Data with third parties, including
Partners
, so we can advertise and market our Services and Partner integrations. Subject to applicable law, including any consent requirements, we may advertise through interest-based advertising and track the efficacy of such ads. See our
Cookie Policy
. We do not transfer your Personal Data to third parties in exchange for payment. However, we may provide your data to third party partners, like advertising partners, analytics providers, and social networks, who assist us in advertising our Services.
Learn more
. We may also use your Personal Data, including your Stripe account activity, to evaluate your eligibility for and offer you Business Services or promote existing Business Services.
Learn more
.
More
. For further information about additional ways by which we may use and share Representatives’ Personal Data, please see the
More ways we collect, use, and share Personal Data
section below.
1.4 Visitors
We collect, use, and share the Personal Data of Visitors. More details about how we collect, use, and share Visitors’ Personal Data, along with the
legal bases
we rely on for processing such Personal Data, can be found in our
Privacy Center
.
a. Personal Data we collect about Visitors
When you browse our Sites, we receive your Personal Data, either provided directly by you or collected through our use of cookies and similar technologies. See our
Cookie Policy
for more information. If you opt to complete a form on the Site or third party websites where our advertisements are displayed (like LinkedIn or Facebook), we collect the information you included in the form. This may include your contact information and other information pertaining to your questions about our Services. We may also associate a location with your visit.
Learn More
.
More
. Further details about other types of Personal Data that we may collect from Visitors, including your online activity, can be found in the
More ways we collect, use, and share Personal Data
section below.
b. How we use and share Personal Data of Visitors
Personalization
. We use the data we collect about you using cookies and similar technologies to measure engagement with the content on the Sites, improve relevancy and navigation, customize your experience (such as language preference and region-specific content), and curate content about Stripe and our Services that's tailored to you. For instance, as not all of our Services are available globally, we may customize our responses based on your region.
Advertising
. Where permitted by applicable law, and where required with your consent, we use and share Visitors’ Personal Data with third parties, including
Partners
, so we can advertise and market our Services and Partner integrations. Subject to applicable law, including any consent requirements, we may advertise through interest-based advertising and track the efficacy of such ads. See our
Cookie Policy
. We do not transfer your Personal Data to third parties in exchange for payment, but we may provide your data to third party partners, like advertising partners, analytics providers, and social networks, who assist us in advertising our Services.
Learn more
.
Engagement
. As you interact with our Sites, we use the information we collect about and through your devices to provide opportunities for further interactions, such as discussions about Services or interactions with chatbots, to address your questions.
More
. For more information about additional ways we may use and share Visitors’ Personal Data, please see the
More ways we collect, use, and share Personal Data
section below.
2. More ways we collect, use, and share Personal Data
In addition to the ways described above, we also process your Personal Data as follows:
a. Collection of Personal Data
Online Activity
. Depending on the Service used and how our Business Services are implemented by the Business Users, we may collect information related to:
The devices and browsers you use across our Sites and third party websites, apps, and other online services (“Third Party Sites”).
Usage data associated with those devices and browsers and your engagement with our Services, including data elements like IP address, plug-ins, language preference, time spent on Sites and Third Party Sites, pages visited, links clicked, payment methods used, and the pages that led you to our Sites and Third Party Sites. We also collect activity indicators, such as mouse activity indicators, to help us detect fraud.
Learn More
. See also our
Cookie Policy
.
Communication and Engagement Information
. We also collect information you choose to share with us through various channels, such as support tickets, emails, or social media. If you respond to emails or surveys from Stripe, we collect your email address, name, and any other data you opt to include in your email or responses. If you engage with us over the phone, we collect your phone number and any other information you might provide during the call. Calls with Stripe or Stripe representatives may be recorded.
Learn More
. Additionally, we collect your engagement data, like your registration for, attendance at, or viewing of Stripe events and any other interactions with Stripe personnel.
Forums and Discussion Groups
. If our Sites allow posting of content, we collect Personal Data that you provide in connection with the post.
b. Use of Personal Data.
Besides the use of Personal Data described above, we use Personal Data in the ways listed below:
Analyzing, Improving, and Developing our Services
. We collect and process Personal Data throughout our various Services, whether you are an End User, End Customer, Representative, or Visitor, to improve our Services, develop new Services, and support our efforts to make our Services more efficient, relevant, and useful to you.
Learn More
.  We may use Personal Data to generate aggregate and statistical information to understand and explain how our Services are used.  Examples of how we use Personal Data to analyze, improve, and develop our products and services include:
Using analytics on our Sites, including as described in our Cookie Policy, to help us understand your use of our Sites and Services and diagnose technical issues.
Training machine learning models to power our Services and protect against fraud and other harm.
Analyzing and drawing inferences from Transaction Data to reduce costs, fraud, and disputes and increase authentication and authorization rates for Stripe and our Business Users.
Communications
. We use the contact information we have about you to deliver our Services, which may involve sending codes via SMS for your authentication.
Learn More
. If you are an End User, Representative, or Visitor, we may communicate with you using the contact information we have about you to provide information about our Services and our affiliates’ services, invite you to participate in our events, surveys, or user research, or otherwise communicate with you for marketing purposes, in compliance with applicable law, including any consent or opt-out requirements. For example, when you provide your contact information to us or when we collect your business contact details through participation at trade shows or other events, we may use this data to follow up with you regarding an event, provide information requested about our Services, and include you in our marketing information campaigns. Where permitted under applicable law, we may record our calls with you to provide our Services, comply with our legal obligations, perform research and quality assurance, and for training purposes.
Social Media and Promotions
. If you opt to submit Personal Data to engage in an offer, program, or promotion, we use the Personal Data you provide to manage the offer, program, or promotion. We also use the Personal Data you provide, along with the Personal Data you make available on social media platforms, for marketing purposes, unless we are not permitted to do so.
Fraud Prevention and Security
. We collect and use Personal Data to help us identify and manage activities that could be fraudulent or harmful across our Services, enable our fraud detection Business Services, and secure our Services and transactions against unauthorized access, use, alteration or misappropriation of Personal Data, information, and funds. As part of the fraud prevention, detection, security monitoring, and compliance efforts for Stripe and its Business Users, we collect information from publicly available sources, third parties (such as credit bureaus), and via the Services we offer. In some instances, we may also collect information about you directly from you, or from our Business Users, Financial Partners, and other third parties for the same purposes. Furthermore, to protect our Services, we may receive details such as IP addresses and other identifying data about potential security threats from third parties.
Learn More
. Such information helps us verify identities, conduct credit checks where lawfully permitted, and prevent fraud. Additionally, we might use technology to evaluate the potential risk of fraud associated with individuals seeking to procure our Business Services or arising from attempted transactions by an End Customer or End User with our Business Users or Financial Partners.
Compliance with Legal Obligations
. We use Personal Data to meet our contractual and legal obligations related to anti-money laundering, Know-Your-Customer ("KYC") laws, anti-terrorism activities, safeguarding vulnerable customers, export control, and prohibition of doing business with restricted persons or in certain business fields, among other legal obligations. For example, we may monitor transaction patterns and other online signals and use those insights to identify fraud, money laundering, and other harmful activity that could affect Stripe, our Financial Partners, End Users, Business Users and others.
Learn More
. Safety, security, and compliance for our Services are key priorities for us, and collecting and using Personal Data is crucial to this effort.
Minors
. Our Services are not directed to children under the age of 13, and we request that they do not provide Personal Data to seek Services directly from Stripe. In certain jurisdictions, we may impose higher age limits as required by applicable law.
c. Sharing of Personal Data.
Besides the sharing of Personal Data described above, we share Personal Data in the ways listed below:
Stripe Affiliates
. We share Personal Data with other Stripe-affiliated entities for purposes identified in this Policy.
Service Providers or Processors
. In order to provide, communicate, market, analyze, and advertise our Services, we depend on service providers. These providers offer critical services such as providing cloud infrastructure, conducting analytics for the assessment of the speed, accuracy, and/or security of our Services, verifying identities, identifying potentially harmful activity, and providing customer service and audit functions. We authorize these service providers to use or disclose the Personal Data we make available to them to perform services on our behalf and to comply with relevant legal obligations. We require these service providers to contractually commit to security and confidentiality obligations for the Personal Data they process on our behalf. The majority of our service providers are based in the European Union, the United States of America, and India.
Learn More
.
Financial Partners
. We share Personal Data with certain Financial Partners to provide Services to Business Users and offer certain Services in conjunction with these Financial Partners. For instance, we may share certain Personal Data, such as payment processing volume, loan repayment data, and Representative contact information, with institutional investors and lenders who purchase loan receivables or provide financing related to Stripe Capital.
Learn More
.
Others with Consent
. In some situations, we may not offer a service, but instead refer you to others (like professional service firms that we partner with to deliver the Atlas Service). In these instances, we will disclose the identity of the third party and the information to be shared with them, and seek your consent to share the information.
Corporate Transactions
. If we enter or intend to enter a transaction that modifies the structure of our business, such as a reorganization, merger, sale, joint venture, assignment, transfer, change of control, or other disposition of all or part of our business, assets, or stock, we may share Personal Data with third parties in connection with such transaction. Any other entity that buys us or part of our business will have the right to continue to use your Personal Data, subject to the terms of this Policy.
Compliance and Harm Prevention
. We share Personal Data when we believe it is necessary to comply with applicable law; to abide by rules imposed by Financial Partners in connection with the use of their payment method; to enforce our contractual rights; to secure and protect the Services, rights, privacy, safety, and property of Stripe, you, and others, including against malicious or fraudulent activity; and to respond to valid legal requests from courts, law enforcement agencies, regulatory agencies, and other public and government authorities, which may include authorities outside your country of residence.
3. Legal bases for processing Personal Data
For purposes of the General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR) and other applicable data protection laws, we rely on a number of legal bases to process your Personal Data.
Learn More
. For some jurisdictions, there may be additional legal bases, which are outlined in the
Jurisdiction-Specific Provisions
section below.
a. Contractual and Pre-Contractual Business Relationships
. We process Personal Data to enter into business relationships with prospective Business Users and End Users and fulfill our respective contractual obligations with them. These processing activities include:
Creation and management of Stripe accounts and Stripe account credentials, including the assessment of applications to initiate or expand the use of our Services;
Creation and management of Stripe Checkout accounts;
Accounting, auditing, and billing activities; and
Processing of payments and related activities, which include fraud detection, loss prevention, transaction optimization, communications about such payments, and related customer service activities.
b. Legal Compliance
. We process Personal Data to verify the identities of individuals and entities to comply with obligations related to fraud monitoring, prevention, and detection, laws associated with identifying and reporting illicit and illegal activities, such as those under the Anti-Money Laundering ("AML") and Know-Your-Customer (“KYC") regulations, and financial reporting obligations. For example, we may be required to record and verify a Business User’s identity to comply with regulations designed to prevent money laundering, fraud, and financial crimes. These legal obligations may require us to report our compliance to third parties and subject ourselves to third party verification audits.
c. Legitimate Interests
. Where permitted under applicable law, we rely on our legitimate business interests to process your Personal Data. The following list provides an example of the business purposes for which we have a legitimate interest in processing your data:
Detection, monitoring, and prevention of fraud and unauthorized payment transactions;
Mitigation of financial loss, claims, liabilities or other harm to End Customers, End Users, Business Users, Financial Partners, and Stripe;
Determination of eligibility for and offering new Stripe Services (
Learn More
);
Response to inquiries, delivery of Service notices, and provision of customer support;
Promotion, analysis, modification, and improvement of our Services, systems, and tools, as well as the development of new products and services, including enhancing the reliability of the Services;
Management, operation, and improvement of the performance of our Sites and Services, through understanding their effectiveness and optimizing our digital assets;
Analysis and advertisement of our Services, and related improvements;
Aggregate analysis and development of business intelligence that enable us to operate, protect, make informed decisions about, and report on the performance of our business;
Sharing of Personal Data with third party service providers that offer services on our behalf and business partners that help us in operating and improving our business (
Learn More)
;
Enabling network and information security throughout Stripe and our Services; and
Sharing of Personal Data among our affiliates.
d. Consent
. We may rely on consent or explicit consent to collect and process Personal Data regarding our interactions with you and the provision of our Services such as Link, Financial Connections, Atlas, and Identity. When we process your Personal Data based on your consent, you have the right to withdraw your consent at any time, and such a withdrawal will not impact the legality of processing performed based on the consent prior to its withdrawal.
e. Substantial Public Interest
. We may process special categories of Personal Data, as defined by the GDPR, when such processing is necessary for reasons of substantial public interest and consistent with applicable law, such as when we conduct politically-exposed person checks. We may also process Personal Data related to criminal convictions and offenses when such processing is authorized by applicable law, such as when we conduct sanctions screening to comply with AML and KYC obligations.
f. Other valid legal bases
. We may process Personal Data further to other valid legal bases as recognized under applicable law in specific jurisdictions. See the Jurisdiction-specific provisions section below for more information.
4. Your rights and choices
Depending on your location and subject to applicable law, you may have choices regarding our collection, use, and disclosure of your Personal Data:
a. Opting out of receiving electronic communications from us
If you wish to stop receiving marketing-related emails from us, you can opt-out by clicking the unsubscribe link included in such emails or as described
here
. We'll try to process your request(s) as quickly as reasonably practicable. However, it's important to note that even if you opt out of receiving marketing-related emails from us, we retain the right to communicate with you about the Services you receive (like support and important legal notices) and our Business Users might still send you messages or instruct us to send you messages on their behalf.
b. Your data protection rights
Depending on your location and subject to applicable law, you may have the following rights regarding the Personal Data we process about you as a data controller:
The right to request confirmation of whether Stripe is processing Personal Data associated with you, the categories of personal data it has processed, and the third parties or categories of third parties with which your Personal Data is shared;
The right to request access to the Personal Data Stripe processes about you (
Learn More
);
The right to request that Stripe rectify or update your Personal Data if it's inaccurate, incomplete, or outdated;
The right to request that Stripe erase your Personal Data in certain circumstances as provided by law (
Learn More
);
The right to request that Stripe restrict the use of your Personal Data in certain circumstances, such as while Stripe is considering another request you've submitted (for instance, a request that Stripe update your Personal Data);
The right to request that we export the Personal Data we hold about you to another company, provided it's technically feasible;
The right to withdraw your consent if your Personal Data is being processed based on your previous consent;
The right to object to the processing of your Personal Data if we are processing your data based on our legitimate interests; unless there are compelling legitimate grounds or the processing is necessary for legal reasons, we will cease processing your Personal Data upon receiving your objection (
Learn More
);
The right not to be discriminated against for exercising these rights; and
The right to appeal any decision by Stripe relating to your rights by contacting Stripe’s Data Protection Officer (“DPO”) at
dpo@stripe.com
, and/or relevant regulatory agencies.
You may have additional rights, depending on applicable law, over your Personal Data. For example, see the Jurisdiction-specific provisions section under United States below.
c. Process for exercising your data protection rights
To exercise your data protection rights related to Personal Data we process as a data controller, visit our
Privacy Center
or contact us as outlined below.  For Personal Data we process as a data processor, please reach out to the relevant data controller (Business User) to exercise your rights. If you contact us regarding your Personal Data we process as a data processor, we will refer you to the relevant data controller to the extent we are able to identify them.
5. Security and Retention
We make reasonable efforts to provide a level of security appropriate to the risk associated with the processing of your Personal Data. We maintain organizational, technical, and administrative measures designed to protect the Personal Data covered by this Policy from unauthorized access, destruction, loss, alteration, or misuse.
Learn More
. Unfortunately, no data transmission or storage system can be guaranteed to be 100% secure.
We encourage you to assist us in protecting your Personal Data. If you hold a Stripe account, you can do so by using a strong password, safeguarding your password against unauthorized use, and avoiding using identical login credentials you use for other services or accounts for your Stripe account. If you suspect that your interaction with us is no longer secure (for instance, you believe that your Stripe account's security has been compromised), please
contact us
immediately.
We retain your Personal Data for as long as we continue to provide the Services to you or our Business Users, or for a period in which we reasonably foresee continuing to provide the Services. Even after we stop providing Services directly to you or to a Business User that you're doing business with, and even after you close your Stripe account or complete a transaction with a Business User, we may continue to retain your Personal Data to:
Comply with our legal and regulatory obligations;
Enable fraud monitoring, detection, and prevention activities; and
Comply with our tax, accounting, and financial reporting obligations, including when such retention is required by our contractual agreements with our Financial Partners (and where data retention is mandated by the payment methods you've used).
In cases where we keep your Personal Data, we do so in accordance with any limitation periods and record retention obligations imposed by applicable law.
Learn More
.
6. International Data Transfers
As a global business, it's sometimes necessary for us to transfer your Personal Data to countries other than your own, including the United States. These countries might have data protection regulations that are different from those in your country. When transferring data across borders, we take measures to comply with applicable data protection laws related to such transfer. In certain situations, we may be required to disclose Personal Data in response to lawful requests from officials, such as law enforcement or security authorities.
Learn More
.
If you are located in the European Economic Area (“EEA”), the United Kingdom ("UK"), or Switzerland, please refer to our
Privacy Center
for additional details. When a data transfer mechanism is mandated by applicable law, we employ one or more of the following:
Transfers to certain countries or recipients that are recognized as having an adequate level of protection for Personal Data under applicable law.
EU Standard Contractual Clauses approved by the European Commission and the UK International Data Transfer Addendum issued by the Information Commissioner’s Office. You can obtain a copy of the relevant Standard Contractual Clauses.
Learn More
.
Other lawful methods available to us under applicable law.
Stripe, Inc. complies with the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (“EU-U.S. DPF”), the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework as set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce and as applicable.
Learn More
.
Stripe’s privacy practices, as described in this Privacy Policy, comply with the Cross Border Privacy Rules System (“CBPR”) and Privacy Rules for Processor (“PRP”) systems. These systems provide a framework for organizations to ensure protection of personal data transferred among participating economies. Where CBPR and/or PRP are recognized as a valid transfer mechanism under applicable law, Stripe will transfer Personal Data in accordance with the CBPR and PRP certifications Stripe has obtained. More information about the framework can be found
here
and
here
. If you have unresolved privacy or data use concerns that we have not addressed satisfactorily, please contact our U.S. based third-party dispute resolution provider (free of charge) at
https://feedback-form.truste.com/watchdog/request
. To view the status of our certifications, please click
here
(CBPR) and
here
(PRP).
7. Updates and notifications
We may change this Policy from time to time to reflect new services, changes in our privacy practices or relevant laws. The “Last updated” legend at the top of this Policy indicates when this Policy was last materially revised. Any changes are effective the latter of when we post the revised Policy on the Services or otherwise provide notice of the update as required by law.
We may provide you with disclosures and alerts regarding the Policy or Personal Data collected by posting them on our website and, if you are an End User or Representative, by contacting you through your Stripe Dashboard, email address and/or the physical address listed in your Stripe account.
8. Jurisdiction-specific provisions
Australia
. “Personal Data” includes “personal information” as defined under applicable privacy laws in Australia, including the Privacy Act 1988 (Cth) as amended from time to time.
If we use personal information to make automated decisions that could reasonably be expected to significantly affect your rights or interests, we will provide the legally required information and transparency via our
Privacy Center
, and/or on a case by case basis.
If you are an Australian resident and dissatisfied with our handling of any complaint you raise under this Policy, you may consider contacting the Office of the Australian Information Commissioner.
Brazil
. You may exercise your rights by contacting our DPO Adi Gilad at dpo@stripe.com. Brazilian residents, for whom the Lei Geral de Proteção de Dados Pessoais (“LGPD”) applies, have rights set forth in Article 18 of the LGPD.
Canada
. As used in this Policy, “applicable law” includes the Federal Personal Information Protection and Electronic Documents Act (“PIPEDA”), the Personal Information Protection Act, SBC 2003 c 63, in British Columbia, the Personal Information Protection Act, SA 2003 c P-6.5, in Alberta, and the Act Respecting the Protection of Personal Information in the Private Sector, CQLR c P-39-1 (“Quebec Private Sector Act”), in Quebec.
Learn more.
“Personal Data” includes “personal information” as defined under those laws.
Stripe’s Chief Privacy Officer is the person in charge of personal information, including under the Quebec Private Sector Act.  You may contact them via email at privacy@stripe.com.  When Stripe collects Personal Data belonging to Canadian (including Quebec) residents, it transfers that data to data centers in the United States.  When Stripe relies on service providers to process Personal Data as described herein, those service providers may also be located outside of Canada or Quebec.
You have the right to request access or rectification of the Personal Data Stripe holds related to you or to withdraw any consent given to the processing of such personal data.  You may exercise those rights by contacting Stripe’s Chief Privacy Officer at privacy@stripe.com.  If you are an End Customer, you should contact the Business User with which you transacted to exercise your rights.
EEA and UK
. You may exercise your rights by contacting our DPO at dpo@stripe.com. If you are a resident of the EEA or the Stripe entity accountable for your Personal data is otherwise subject to the GDPR, and you believe our processing of your information contradicts the GDPR, you may direct your questions or complaints to the Irish Data Protection Commission. If you are a resident of the UK, direct your questions or concerns to the UK Information Commissioner’s Office. You also have additional rights under the EU-U.S. DPF and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF.
Learn More
.
India
. In this Policy, “applicable law” includes the Digital Personal Data Protection Act (“DPDPA”) once the DPDPA enters into effect. Further, the term “data controller” includes “data fiduciaries,” and the term “data subject” includes “data principal,” both as defined in the DPDPA.
In some cases, and as permitted under the DPDPA, we may rely on “legitimate use” as a legal basis. For example, we might do so when you voluntarily provide your Personal Data to us. Where we are required to obtain your explicit and informed consent, we will do so on a case by case basis. “Consent Managers” as defined under the DPDPA may submit a request to revoke or provide consent using the methods described in the Contact Us section below, or as set out in the following paragraph, or via other means made available by Stripe in the future. We may ask for proof of authorization and identity before processing such a request.
You have the right to contact Stripe to nominate another individual, who may, in the event of your death or incapacity, exercise your rights under this Privacy Policy and under the DPDPA and implementing regulations.
In certain cases, you may be asked to consent to the collection and processing of your Aadhaar number by Stripe India Private Limited and/or its third party verification partner(s). The purpose of this collection is to facilitate the identification verification process as required under applicable laws. Your provision of Aadhaar details is purely voluntary, and you may provide other identification documents as may be accepted by us from time to time. You will not be denied service merely for not submitting Aadhaar details.
If you have any questions or complaints regarding the processing of your Personal Data in India, or if you want to receive this Policy or communicate with us about privacy in one of India’s official languages, please
contact our Nodal and Grievance Officer
.
Learn More
. Alternatively, you may contact our DPO at dpo@stripe.com. If we are unable to address your complaint or grievance, you have the right to escalate the matter to the Data Protection Board of India.
Indonesia
. In this Policy, “applicable law” includes Law No. 11 of 2008 as amended by Law No. 19 of 2016 on Electronic Information and Transactions, Government Regulation No. 71 of 2019 on the Implementation of Electronic Systems and Transactions, and Minister of Communication and Informatics Regulation No. 20 of 2016 on Personal Data Protection in Electronic Systems, and from September 2024, Law No. 27 of 2022 concerning Personal Data Protection (“PDP Law”). If you have any questions or complaints about this Policy, please contact our DPO at dpo@stripe.com.
Japan
. In this Policy, “applicable law” includes the Act on the Protection of Personal Information (“APPI”). When we transfer Personal Data of data subjects in Japan to jurisdictions not recognized as ‘adequate’ by the Personal Information Protection Commission, we enter into written agreements with any third parties located outside of Japan. These written agreements provide rights and obligations equivalent to those provided under the Japanese Act on the Protection of Personal Information. For more information on how we ensure that third parties protect your data and where your data is located, please see above or contact us as described below. For a description of foreign systems and frameworks that may affect the implementation of equivalent measures by the third party, see
here
. In some cases, and as permitted under the APPI, we may rely on “public interest” as a legal basis, such as fraud detection and loss prevention.
Malaysia
. If you have any questions or complaints about this Policy, please contact our DPO at dpo@stripe.com.
Singapore
. In this Policy, “applicable law” includes the Personal Data Protection Act 2012 (“PDPA”) (No. 26 of 2012) as amended from time to time. In some cases, and as permitted under the PDPA, we may rely on “deemed consent” as a legal basis. For example, we do so when you voluntarily provide your personal data to us. If you have any questions or complaints about this Policy, please contact our DPO at dpo@stripe.com.
Switzerland
. In this Policy, “applicable law” includes the Swiss Federal Act on Data Protection (“FADP”), as revised. To exercise your rights under the FADP, please contact our DPO at dpo@stripe.com. You may also have additional rights under the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework.
Learn More
.
Thailand
. In this Policy, “applicable law” includes the Personal Data Protection Act 2019 (“PDPA”). If we rely on certain legal bases (such as “legal obligation” or “contractual necessity” and you do not provide us with your Personal Data, we may not be able to lawfully provide you services. If you have any questions or complaints about this Policy, please contact our DPO at
dpo@stripe.com
. Where required, we have put in place appropriate safeguards for the cross-border transfer of Personal Data from Thailand, including the EU Standard Contractual Clauses as adapted for Thailand data transfers in accordance with the Notification of the Personal Data Protection Committee on Criteria for the Protection of Personal Data Sent or Transferred to a Foreign Country Pursuant to Section 29 of the Personal Data Protection Act, B.E. 2562 B.E. 2566 (2023).
United States
. If you are a consumer located in the United States (“US”), we process your personal information in accordance with US federal and state privacy laws. For additional  details, please review the information below and see our additional U.S. Privacy Disclosures
here
. Stripe uses cookies, including advertising cookies, as described in our
Cookie Policy
.
Your Rights and Choices
. As a US consumer and subject to certain limitations under US privacy laws, you may have choices regarding our use and disclosure of your Personal Data.  In addition to the
above rights
, you may also have the rights listed in this section. Please see our Privacy Center to
learn more
about data subject rights metrics and
learn more
about the laws under which these rights may apply.
Exercising the right to know: You have a right to request additional information about the categories of personal information collected, sold, disclosed, or shared; purposes for which this personal information was collected, sold, or shared; categories of sources of personal information; and categories of third parties with whom we disclosed or shared this personal information.
Exercising the right to opt-out from a sale or sharing: We do not transfer your personal data to third parties in exchange for payment. However, as noted above, we may provide the data to third party partners, such as advertising partners, analytics providers, and social networks, who assist us in advertising our products and Services to you. Because these third parties may use the data Stripe provides for their own purposes, Stripe's provision of data to these parties may be considered a data “sale” or “sharing” (for behavioral advertising) as those terms are defined under the CCPA and other applicable US privacy laws. You can opt out of targeted advertising and any related data “sales” or “sharing” (for behavioral advertising)
here
.
Exercising the right to limit the use or sharing of Sensitive Personal Information: We do not sell or share (for behavioral advertising) Sensitive Personal Information as defined by US privacy laws and have not done so in the past 12 months. Learn more about our collection and use of Sensitive Personal Information over the last 12 months
here
.
Profiling with legal or similarly significant effects
: In the event that we engage in profiling or automated decision making for which applicable law entitles you to an opt out we will provide you with notice of how to exercise that opt-out right.
Appeal
: If you wish to appeal any of our decisions regarding a rights request under US privacy laws, you may do so by contacting Stripe’s Data Protection Officer (“DPO”) at
dpo@stripe.com
.
To submit a request to exercise any of the rights described above, please contact us using the methods described in the Contact Us section below. Please note that rights under some U.S. state laws do not apply to Personal Data we collect, process, and disclose when you act as a consumer to obtain financial products or services from Stripe for personal, family, or household purposes. The federal Gramm-Leach Bliley Act may govern how Stripe shares and protects that data instead. See our
US Consumer Privacy Notice
below for more information.
We will verify your request by asking you to send it from the email address associated with your account or requiring you to provide information necessary to verify your identity, including name, address, transaction history, photo identification, and other information associated with your account.
You may designate, in writing or through a power of attorney, an authorized agent to make requests on your behalf to exercise your rights under the CCPA and other applicable US privacy laws. Your agent may submit a request on your behalf by contacting us using the methods described in the Contact Us section below. We may still require you to directly verify your identity and confirm that you gave the authorized agent permission to submit the request.
Global Privacy Control signals
. Stripe honors the Global Privacy Control (GPC) opt-out preference signals.
Learn More
.
9. Contact us
If you have any questions or complaints about this Policy, please
contact us
. If you are an End Customer (i.e., an individual doing business or transacting with a Business User), please refer to the privacy policy or notice of the Business User for information regarding the Business User’s privacy practices, choices and controls, or contact the Business User directly.
10. US Consumer Privacy Notice
The following Consumer Privacy Notice applies to you if you are an individual who resides in the United States and obtains financial services from Stripe primarily for your own personal, family, or household purposes.
Last updated: January 16, 2025
FACTS
WHAT DOES STRIPE DO WITH YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION?
Why?
Financial companies choose how they share your personal information.  Federal law gives consumers the right to limit some but not all sharing.  Federal law also requires us to tell you how we collect, share, and protect your personal information.  Please read this notice carefully to understand what we do.
What?
The types of personal information we collect and share depend on the product or service you have with us. This information can include:
• Social Security Number
• Contact details
• Account balances and transaction history
• Payment, transaction, and purchase information and history
When you are
no longer
our customer, we continue to share your information as described in this notice.
How?
All financial companies need to share customers' personal information to run their everyday business. In the section below, we list the reasons financial companies can share their customers' personal information; the reasons Stripe chooses to share; and whether you can limit this sharing.
Reasons we can share your personal information
Does Stripe Share?
Can you limit this sharing
For our everyday business purposes – such as to process your transactions, maintain your account(s), respond to court orders and legal investigations, or report to credit bureaus
Yes
No
For our marketing purposes - to offer our products and Services to you
Yes
No
For joint marketing with other financial companies
Yes
No
For our affiliates' everyday business purposes - information about your transactions and experiences
Yes
No
For our affiliates' everyday business purposes - information about your creditworthiness
No
We don’t share
For our affiliates to market to you
No
We don’t share
For nonaffiliates to market to you  (for data not collected through Financial Connections)
Yes
Yes
For nonaffiliates to market to you  (for data collected through Financial Connections)
No
We don’t share
To limit our sharing
Login to your Link account at
app.link.com/settings
and toggle off data sharing from the Messaging menu.
Please note: If you are a new customer, we can begin sharing your information 30 days from the date we sent this notice. When you are no longer our customer, we continue to share your information as described in this notice.
However, you can contact us at any time to limit our sharing.
Questions?
Contact us at privacy@stripe.com or visit us at https://support.link.com
Who we are
Who is providing this notice?
Stripe, Inc., Stripe Payments Company, and their affiliates that provide consumers services in the U.S.
What we do
How does Stripe protect my personal information?
To protect your personal information from unauthorized access, destruction, loss, alteration, or misuse we use security measures to comply with federal law.  These measures include computer safeguards and secured files and buildings.  We impose access controls along with ongoing monitoring to prevent data misuse, and we require our service providers to take similar steps to protect your information.
How does Stripe collect my personal information?
We collect your personal information, for example, when you
• open a Link account;
• ask Stripe to process a payment for goods or services;
• provide bank account information to Stripe using Financial Connections
We also collect your personal information from others, such as affiliates or other companies.
Why can’t I limit all sharing?
Federal law gives you the right to limit only
• sharing for affiliates’ everyday business purposes — information about your creditworthiness
• affiliates from using your information to market to you
• sharing for nonaffiliates to market to you.
State laws and individual companies may give you additional rights to limit sharing. See the Other Important Information section below for more information on your rights under state law.
What happens when I limit sharing for an account I hold jointly with someone else?
Your choices will apply to everyone on your account.
Definitions
Affiliates
Companies related by common ownership or control. They can be financial and nonfinancial companies.
• Our affiliates include companies operating under the Stripe name, such as Stripe Technology Europe, Ltd. and Stripe Payments UK, Ltd.
Nonaffiliates
Companies not related by common ownership or control.  They can be financial and nonfinancial companies.
• Nonaffiliates with which we share personal information include service providers that perform services or functions on our behalf, Business Users with which you choose to transact, partners with which we share data to provide you with services, and advertising partners, analytics providers, and social networks, who assist us in advertising our Services to you.
Joint Marketing
A formal agreement between non-affiliated financial companies that together market financial products or services to you.
• Our joint marketing partners include financial companies we partner with to provide you with financial services.
Other important information
Vermont: If your account with us is associated with a Vermont billing address, we will not disclose information about your creditworthiness to our affiliates and will not disclose your personal information, financial information, credit report, or health information to nonaffiliated third parties to market to you, other than as permitted by Vermont law, unless you authorize us to make those disclosures.  For joint marketing, we will only disclose your name, contact information, and information about your transactions.  Additional information concerning our privacy policies can be found in our
Privacy Policy
and
Privacy Center
.
California: If your account with us is associated with a California billing address, we will not disclose Personal Data we collect about you except to the extent permitted under California law.  For instance, we may disclose your Personal Data as necessary to process transactions or provide products and services you request, at your instruction, as required for institution risk control, and to safeguard against fraud, identity theft, and unauthorized transactions.
For additional information about our privacy practices, please visit the
Stripe Privacy Center
.
Sub-policy 1
http://www.adyen.com/policies-and-disclaimer/privacy-policy:
Transaction
Compliance obligations
Embedded financial products
Security
Marketing
Website
Other
Privacy Statement
Please read this privacy statement if you would like to know more about the way Adyen and its
group companies around the world
(hereinafter referred to as “Adyen” or “we”) collect and process your personal data. This privacy statement applies to the processing activities in which Adyen acts as a data controller.
It is important to us that your personal data is handled carefully, and that you are well informed about the way we process your personal data. This privacy statement tells you what data we process – including how, why and how long we process it for – and informs you of your data privacy rights.
Adyen reserves the right to update its privacy statement at any time. Such updates will be made and posted on our publicly available website
https://www.adyen.com/privacy-policy
.
Version as of June 4, 2024.
Download as PDF
Hi there,
We have updated our Privacy Statement as of the June 4, 2024. To read the previous (March 2023) version, please click
here
.
General information
Adyen is a financial technology company operating under a banking license. This means that Adyen provides its customers with payments and other financial products, including payments processing for its customers and platforms via credit card, bank transfer, and other payment methods, card issuing, (merchant) bank accounts, fraud detection, and other financial services. It is also important to note that Adyen N.V. is supervised by the Dutch Central Bank as a regulated bank under Dutch law. In addition, Adyen and its group companies are supervised by various regulators and authorities, as applicable, around the globe.
You may have seen Adyen on your bank statements if you have bought something, automatically renewed a subscription, or received a payout from one of Adyen’s customers. If you would like more information about any of these charges, you can use
Adyen’s Look Up Charge Tool
.
If you would like to exercise your
data subject rights
(outlined below) under data privacy law, please use
Adyen’s Privacy Form
.
You may have the following rights regarding your personal data, subject to to certain exceptions:
Right to access
: You may have the right to ask us for the specific personal data that we have collected from you in a portable and (where technically possible) usable format.
Right to know
: You may have the right to verify that we have collected personal data about you, as well as know what personal data we have collected about you. This includes, as applicable, the categories of personal data we have collected, the sources from which we collected that personal data, the business or commercial purposes for which we collected, “sold”, and “shared” that personal data, the categories of personal data that we “sold”, “shared”, or disclosed to third parties for business purposes and the categories of third parties to whom we “sold”, “shared”, or disclosed personal data. You can also contact us if you want to know more about the data we process for our legitimate interests.
Right to deletion
: You may be entitled to request that we delete the personal data that we have collected from you. We will use all commercially reasonable efforts to honor your request, in compliance with applicable laws. Please note, however, that we may need or be required to keep such information, such as for our legitimate business purposes, or to comply with applicable laws.
Right to opt-out of sales and sharing of personal data to third parties for cross-context behavioral advertising:
You are entitled to opt-out of sales of your personal data to third parties and to opt-out of the sharing of your personal data to third parties for cross-context behavioral advertising, if applicable. You can opt-out of sales and sharing of your personal data by visiting our Cookies Policy and disabling the ‘Sale or Share of Personal Data’ toggle in the Cookies Preference Center,  or by contacting us using one of the methods below. If you have enabled the Global Privacy Control mechanism on your browser, device, or platform, you will automatically be opted out of any “sharing” when you use our website. Adyen seamlessly processes the Global Privacy Control (GPC) signal if enabled on your browser, device, or platform. Please visit
this page
to learn more about enabling the GPC.
Right to object to the processing of your personal data:
You are entitled to object to us processing your personal data. In addition, where you have given your consent for us to process personal data, you can withdraw this consent at any time. Please note that Adyen maintains a record of withdrawals of consent to ensure that we do not contact you in the future.
Right to opt-out of profiling:
As defined under privacy laws, Adyen may profile customers to determine their eligibility for certain financial products, or to offer them certain financial services. Please note that opting-out of profiling will mean that you are no longer eligible for these financial products or services.
Right to correct your personal data:
You may have the right to update inaccurate information that we process about you.
Right to exercise rights without discrimination
: You have the right not to receive discriminatory treatment if you exercise the rights conferred to you by applicable privacy laws.
These rights may be limited under applicable laws, and are also subject to technical feasibility. For example, if we collect your personal data in our role as a service provider to one of our customers, you will need to contact that customer directly to exercise your rights.
Please note that we may require additional information from you to verify your identity and process your request. Alternatively, you can submit a request through an authorized representative using the contact methods described below. If you use an authorized representative, we may require a copy of their signed permission to act on your behalf. We may also need to verify your identity directly and ask you to confirm the representative’s authority.
To exercise your rights, your information will be disclosed to our privacy management third-party service provider. Please be informed that Adyen has implemented the appropriate safeguards to ensure your information is adequately protected.
Some of the information you send us may be disclosed to other Adyen group companies outside of the European Economic Area ("EEA"). These countries encompass the countries in which we have operations (you can find a full list
here
).
If you are a resident in Quebec, some of the information you send us may be disclosed to Adyen group companies outside of Quebec.
To protect your data when it is transferred to countries outside of the EEA, we have implemented appropriate safeguards. When we transfer data to our Adyen group companies, the transfers are protected by an intragroup agreement containing Standard Contractual Clauses. For transfers to our services providers located outside of the EEA, we rely on Standard Contractual Clauses. If you would like to know more about these safeguards, you can contact us using the details below, under “Contact us”.
We use third parties to offer you our website, as well as our products and services. Where necessary, we will disclose your information to our service providers and professional advisers (e.g. IT providers, KYC partners, CRM providers, marketing support providers (such as agencies that manage our social media accounts), social media providers such as LinkedIn, analysts, customer service providers, business development providers and legal service providers). We have established agreements with our service providers to protect your personal data.
If our business is sold or integrated with another business, your details will be disclosed to our advisers and any prospective purchaser’s advisers, and will be passed to the new owners of the business.
We may disclose information to third parties in connection with legal claims, or when we have a legal obligation to do so. We may also disclose information with your permission (such as if we wish to disclose your details with another group company for their recruitment purposes).
The table below provides a summary of the categories of personal data that we collect and disclose to service providers and other third parties.
Name, date of birth, contact information, bank account number, tax identification number, nationality and national identification number, and job title, including biometric data. Birth certificates for parents or guardians of minors (children ages 13-17).
When you sign up for Adyen services. We are legally obliged to collect this information.
Adyen discloses this information to identity and verify providers and screening partners, including credit reference agencies, and may disclose this information to regulatory authorities upon request or for mandated reporting. Adyen may disclose this information to payment schemes, local payment providers, debt collecting agencies, and other third-party service providers, depending on the services acquired. Adyen may also make such information available to Platform customers you have signed up with.
Your name, business email, phone number, company name, and website.
When you fill out our sales form and when we  communicate with you. Adyen collects this information for marketing purposes, and for providing our products and services.
Adyen discloses this information with our customer relationship management (“CRM”) service providers so they can reach out and further build a relationship.
Name, bank account numbers and credit card numbers.
When you sign up for Adyen services. Adyen is legally obliged to collect this information, and it also helps us to provide our products and services.
Adyen discloses this information with customers for our embedded financial products, card printing partners for our  Issuing product, and with law enforcement agencies in compliance with legal orders.
Credit card details, debit card details, transaction amount, date and time of transaction.
When you purchase a good  or a service from an Adyen customer. Adyen collects this information for the purpose of providing our products and services.
Adyen discloses this information to our customers in our Customer Area, to authorities pursuant to legal orders, and to the selected payment schemes, such as Visa and Mastercard, and local payment methods upon request. Adyen may disclose this information to regulatory authorities upon request or for mandated reporting.
Cookies
When you visit Adyen’s website. Adyen collects this information for marketing purposes.
Adyen discloses this information to IT providers, CRM providers, social media providers, and advertising networks for its own advertising purposes.
Social Security number, driver’s license, or identification document, and passport.
When you sign up for Adyen services. Adyen is legally obliged to collect this information.
Adyen discloses this information to identity verification providers, including credit reference agencies, to tax authorities as legally required, and regulatory authorities upon request or for mandated reporting.
Adyen does not use or disclose this sensitive personal information for any other purpose.
Adyen does not knowingly “sell” or “share” the personal data of individuals under 16 years of age.
We reserve the right to use de-identified or aggregated data for any purpose without limitation, and we will not attempt to re-identify the information.
We will only keep your data for as long as we reasonably need to for the purposes listed above, or as otherwise required by law.
Questions, comments, requests, or complaints concerning this privacy statement or the way we process your personal data are welcomed and can be addressed to our Data Protection Officer at
dpo@adyen.com
or  Simon Carmiggeltstraat 5-60, 1011 DJ Amsterdam, the Netherlands, or to
lgpd@adyen.com
if you are located in Brazil.
If you would like further details on any of the third parties your personal data is “sold” to or “shared” with, would like to know the purpose of their data processing, the manner in which data is processed, or how you can communicate with such third party to exercise your data privacy rights, please contact
dpo@adyen.com
, or
lgpd@adyen.com
if you are located in Brazil.
If you have a complaint about the way we handle your personal data, you also have the right to address this to the data protection authority of the country in which you live or work, or the country in which we are located.
Learn more
Transaction
Compliance obligations
Embedded financial products
Security
Marketing
Website
Other
Cookie Policy
You can read more about how we use cookies, how we share your data with our partners, and how you can change your settings on our Cookie Policy. To learn what personal information we collect about you, the purpose we process your data for, and how you can opt-out of the sales or sharing of your personal information, please see our
Accept All Cookies
Reject All
Cookies Settings
Your Opt Out Preference Signal is Honored
Cookie Preference Center
When you visit our website, we may store or retrieve information on your browser, mostly in the form of cookies. This information might be about you, your preferences or your device and is mostly used to make the site work as you expect it to do. The information does not usually directly identify you, but it can give you a more personalized web experience. Because we respect your right to privacy, you can choose not to allow some types of cookies. Click on the different category headings to find out more and change our default settings. However, blocking some types of cookies may impact your experience of the site and the services we are able to offer. For more information, please see our
Cookie Policy
Allow All
Manage Consent Preferences
Targeting Cookies
These cookies may be set through our site by our advertising partners. They may be used by those companies to build a profile of your interests and show you relevant adverts on other sites. They do not store directly personal information, but are based on uniquely identifying your browser and internet device. If you do not allow these cookies, you will experience less targeted advertising.
Performance Cookies
These cookies allow us to count visits and traffic sources so we can measure and improve the performance of our site. They help us to know which pages are the most and least popular and see how visitors move around the site. All information these cookies collect is aggregated and therefore anonymous. If you do not allow these cookies we will not know when you have visited our site, and will not be able to monitor its performance.
Functional Cookies
These cookies enable the website to provide enhanced functionality and personalisation. They may be set by us or by third party providers whose services we have added to our pages. If you do not allow these cookies then some or all of these services may not function properly.
Always Active
These cookies are necessary for the website to function and cannot be switched off in our systems. They are usually only set in response to actions made by you which amount to a request for services, such as setting your privacy preferences, logging in or filling in forms. You can set your browser to block or alert you about these cookies, but some parts of the site will not then work. These cookies do not store any personally identifiable information.
Social Media Cookies
We only place social media cookies if you have given us your permission to do this. Social Media cookies collect information about your browsing habits in order to make our content and advertising as relevant to you and your interests as possible. These cookies are also used to help us measure the effectiveness of our advertising campaigns by tracking the number of clicks. The cookies are usually placed by third party advertising networks. They remember the websites you visit and use this information to give you access to interesting and exciting content on our website and to show you more personalized adverts when you visit other websites. These cookies also help improve your browsing experience, for example by helping to prevent the same advertisement from reappearing to you. Additionally, social media platforms such as Facebook and Twitter can use cookies to see if you are logged in and allow you to "like" content or forward it to your friends. Depending on your settings, these third parties may use your information for their own purposes, such as advertising. If you would like to know more how these social media platforms use data, please refer to the privacy notices of these platforms.
Back Button
Cookie List
Search Icon
Filter Icon
Clear
checkbox label
label
Apply
Cancel
Consent
Leg.Interest
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
Sub-policy 2
https://usa.visa.com/legal/privacy-policy.html:
Visa Privacy Center
Global Privacy Notice
Visa Cookie Notice
Your Privacy Rights
US Social Security Statement Page
Visa Privacy Center
Visa values your trust and respects your privacy. This Privacy Center will help you understand how we collect, use, and share your Personal Information. You can also find links to help you exercise your privacy rights.
Global Privacy Notice
Our
Global Privacy Notice
explains how we collect, use and disclose Personal Information.
We also have a
Cookie Notice
that explains our practices with regard to cookies, tags and similar types of online data that we collect.
The following supplemental privacy notices provide additional information as required by law:
For Argentina (Spanish)
For Australia (English)
For Brazil (Portuguese)
For Canada (English)
For China Mainland (Simplified Chinese)
For Colombia (Spanish)
For European Economic Area (EEA) (English)
For Japan (Japanese)
For Taiwan (Traditional Chinese)
For Turkey (Turkish)
U.S. State Privacy Rights
U.S. - Social Security Number Policy and Sensitive Personal Information Statement
U.S. – End User Open Banking Privacy Notice
While the Visa Global Privacy Program safeguards all the information that we collect and use, some Visa products and platforms have their own privacy notices. These notices reflect the business-specific requirements that apply. Please read the privacy notices published on our sites and platforms when you sign-up.
To submit a request to exercise privacy rights under relevant laws, please access our
Privacy Rights Portal
.
Contact Visa’s Global Privacy Office
Send us an email
privacy@visa.com
Please do not include sensitive information, such as your account number, in emails.
Write to us
Visa Global Privacy Office
900 Metro Center Blvd.
Foster City, CA 94404 USA
Visa websites only collect and share your personal information for cross-contextual behavioral and targeted advertising with your consent. You may review and select your choices below. For details, see the
Visa Cookie Notice
.
Accept
Reject all
Review choices
38
Strictly necessary
Consent for: Strictly necessary
These technologies are necessary for the underlying operation of the site or app or to display or enable functionality you have requested.
Detailed description of cookies categorised as: Strictly necessary.
Cookie
Expiry
Domain
Company
Purpose
Description
Cookie
tv_UIRF
Expiry
1 years, 1 months
Domain
tremorhub.com
Company
Purpose
Under review
Description
This cookie is currently under review and its purpose is being assigned. Once complete, this description will be updated accordingly.
Cookie
_bti
Expiry
1 years
Domain
visa.com
Company
Purpose
Under review
Description
This cookie is currently under review and its purpose is being assigned. Once complete, this description will be updated accordingly.
Cookie
_bts
Expiry
1 hours
Domain
visa.com
Company
Purpose
Under review
Description
This cookie is currently under review and its purpose is being assigned. Once complete, this description will be updated accordingly.
Cookie
_cfuvid (x 6)
Expiry
Session
Domain
secure.checkout.visa.com
Company
Cloudflare, Inc.
Purpose
Authorisation
Description
Cookie related to rate limiting policies. Cloudflare Rate Limiting is a feature that allows customers to identify and mitigate high request rates automatically, either for specific URLs or for an entire domain.
Cookie
__cflb (x 5)
Expiry
23 hours
Domain
www.visa.com
Company
Cloudflare, Inc.
Purpose
Your visit
Description
Cookie related to load balancing.
Cookie
__cfruid (x 6)
Expiry
Session
Domain
cdn.visa.com
Company
Cloudflare, Inc.
Purpose
Authorisation
Description
Cookie related to rate limiting policies. Cloudflare Rate Limiting is a feature that allows customers to identify and mitigate high request rates automatically, either for specific URLs or for an entire domain.
Cookie
__cf_bm (x 3)
Expiry
30 minutes
Domain
chat.visa.com
Company
Cloudflare, Inc.
Purpose
Authorisation
Description
Maintains bot management for our site and manage incoming traffic that may be associated with bots for security purposes
Cookie
wscrCookieConsent
Expiry
1 year
Domain
usa.visa.com
Company
Digital Control Room Ltd
Purpose
Your visit
Description
Stores your cookie consent session for our site. It contains no information other than whether you have opted in or out for each cookie level.
Cookie
BIGipServer
*
Expiry
1 hour
Domain
abrtp1-cdn.marketo.com
Company
F5 Networks, Inc
Purpose
Your visit
Description
Stores the address and port of the web server handling the session, and is used by F5 Networks, Inc. to improve the performance and security of the site.
Cookie
f5avraaaaaaaaaaaaaaaa_session_
Expiry
Session
Domain
cts.businesswire.com
Company
F5 Networks, Inc
Purpose
Your visit
Description
Stores the address and port of the web server handling the session, and is used by F5 Networks, Inc. to improve the performance and security of the site.
Cookie
receive-cookie-deprecation (x 2)
Expiry
1 year
Domain
doubleclick.net
Company
Google
Purpose
Your visit
Description
To prepare for third-party cookie deprecation, Google provide Chrome-facilitated testing modes that allow sites to preview how site behaviour and functionality works without third-party cookies.
Cookie
TAPID
Expiry
1 year
Domain
tealiumiq.com
Company
Tealium
Purpose
Your visit
Description
Used by tag manager Tealium to anonymously identify the visitor.
Cookie
utag_main
Expiry
1 year
Domain
visa.com
Company
Tealium
Purpose
Your visit
Description
Used to store the Tealium ID required to enable visitor information to be analysed.
Cookie
JSESSIONID
Expiry
Session
Domain
cts.businesswire.com
Company
Visa
Purpose
Your visit
Description
Stores session data during a website visit.
Cookie
lbs
Expiry
Session
Domain
usa.visa.com
Company
Visa
Purpose
Your visit
Description
Loadbalancer cookie used to maintain the session.
Cookie
MEPAJSESSIONID
Expiry
Session
Domain
usa.visa.com
Company
Visa
Purpose
Your visit
Description
Used to achieve server affinity for your session.
Cookie
ready
Expiry
Session
Domain
secure.checkout.visa.com
Company
Visa
Purpose
Your visit
Description
Detects whether the user’s browser accepts third party cookies in order to show the correct user navigation
Cookie
AWSELB
Expiry
Session
Domain
rum.optimizely.com
Company
Amazon Web Services, Amazon.com, Inc.
Purpose
Your visit
Description
Used by Elastic Load Balancing from Amazon Web Services to effectively balance load on the servers.
Cookie
AWSELBCORS
Expiry
Session
Domain
rum.optimizely.com
Company
Amazon Web Services, Amazon.com, Inc.
Purpose
Your visit
Description
Used by Elastic Load Balancing from Amazon Web Services to effectively balance load on the servers.
Cookie
ar_debug
Expiry
30 days
Domain
doubleclick.net
Company
DoubleClick, Google LLC
Purpose
Your visit
Description
This cookie is used by DoubleClick to debug ads.
Cookie
__Secure-ROLLOUT_TOKEN
Expiry
180 days
Domain
youtube.com
Company
YouTube, Google LLC
Purpose
Your visit
Description
Functional delivery of YouTube
5
Analytics
Consent for: Analytics
These technologies are used to measure aggregate website activity, allowing Visa to optimize content.
Detailed description of cookies categorised as: Analytics.
Cookie
Expiry
Domain
Company
Purpose
Description
Cookie
ar_debug
Expiry
90 days
Domain
region1.google-analytics.com
Company
Google Analytics, Google LLC
Purpose
Your visit
Description
This cookie is used by Google Analytics when enabling debug mode using the Google Tag Assistant.
Cookie
_ga
Expiry
2 years
Domain
visa.com
Company
Google Analytics, Google LLC
Purpose
Analytics
Description
A unique identifier given to each browser to track user interactions with the website.
Cookie
_ga_
*
(x 3)
Expiry
2 years
Domain
visa.com
Company
Google Analytics, Google LLC
Purpose
Analytics
Description
A unique identifier given to each browser to track user interactions with the website.
0
Site experience
Consent for: Site experience
These technologies are used to support your experience and include user-selected options and site navigation aids.
We do not use any cookies in this category.
16
Performance and operation
Consent for: Performance and operation
These technologies are used in the management of a site or app, including to record visitor numbers and identify issues users are experiencing.
Detailed description of cookies categorised as: Performance and operation.
Cookie
Expiry
Domain
Company
Purpose
Description
Cookie
ak_bmsc
Expiry
Domain
businesswire.com
Company
Akamai Technologies
Purpose
Performance / Networking
Description
Cookie used to optimize performance, and to improve the user experience, on ​Akamai​ websites.
Cookie
gi
Expiry
1 day
Domain
r.3gl.net
Company
Catchpoint Systems, Inc.
Purpose
Analytics
Description
Catchpoint monitors your experience on the website to detect, identify, and resolve issues quickly.
Cookie
ua
Expiry
1 hour
Domain
r.3gl.net
Company
Catchpoint Systems, Inc.
Purpose
Analytics
Description
Catchpoint monitors your experience on the website to detect, identify, and resolve issues quickly.
Cookie
_cs_c
Expiry
1 year, 1 month
Domain
visa.com
Company
ContentSquare
Purpose
Analytics
Description
ContentSquare assists with optimising the website design. This cookies saves the visitor's consent to be tracked.
Cookie
_cs_id
Expiry
13 months
Domain
visa.com
Company
ContentSquare
Purpose
Analytics
Description
ContentSquare assists with optimising the website design. This cookie anonymously recognises a returning visitor.
Cookie
_cs_mk
Expiry
30 minutes
Domain
visa.com
Company
ContentSquare
Purpose
Analytics
Description
This cookie is used for the Google Analytics and Adobe Analytics integrations. It is to make sure the Adobe and Google dimensions and evars are set only once per 30 minutes.
Cookie
_cs_root-domain
Expiry
Session
Domain
visa.com
Company
ContentSquare
Purpose
Analytics
Description
ContentSquare assists with optimising the website design.
Cookie
_cs_s
Expiry
30 minutes
Domain
visa.com
Company
ContentSquare
Purpose
Analytics
Description
ContentSquare assists with optimising the website design. This cookie contains the number of page views.
Cookie
_cs_
<digits>
*
Expiry
Session
Domain
usa.visa.com
Company
ContentSquare
Purpose
Analytics
Description
ContentSquare assists with optimising the website design.
Cookie
_pk_id
*
Expiry
2 years
Domain
usa.visa.com
Company
Matomo
Purpose
Analytics
Description
Recognise a returning visitor.
Cookie
_pk_ses
*
Expiry
30 minutes
Domain
usa.visa.com
Company
Matomo
Purpose
Analytics
Description
Recognise a returning visitor.
Cookie
optimizelySession
Expiry
180 days
Domain
visa.com
Company
Optimizely
Purpose
Analytics
Description
This cookie gets the current domain to determine whether cross-domain syncing is possible.
Cookie
optimizelyDomainTestCookie
Expiry
6 months
Domain
visa.com
Company
Optimizely, Inc.
Purpose
Analytics
Description
Optimizely sets this cookie to determine the current domain and to check whether cross-domain syncing is possible.
Cookie
optimizelyRumLB
Expiry
Session
Domain
rum.optimizely.com
Company
Optimizely, Inc.
Purpose
Analytics
Description
Used by Analytics platform Optimizely to provide A/B testing by changing the site design for a sample of users. Movements are tracked to gather data on the most successful site variation.
Cookie
ELOQUA
Expiry
2 years
Domain
eloqua.com
Company
Eloqua, Oracle Corporation
Purpose
Analytics
Description
This cookie has a value pair of guid = randomly generated string of characters and numbers. Used for data lookup which allows the dynamic pulling of data from the Eloqua system for use on a given web page. The range of data that can be returned is virtually unlimited allowing for Contact, Prospect, Data Card, Group membership or Visitor data to be returned. Data lookups are used to populate data in a form or validate if the contact is part of an email group.
Cookie
ELQSTATUS
Expiry
2 years
Domain
eloqua.com
Company
Eloqua, Oracle Corporation
Purpose
Analytics
Description
This cookie gets dropped ONLY if the client consents to being tracked. Used for data lookup which allows the dynamic pulling of data from the Eloqua system for use on a given web page. The range of data that can be returned is virtually unlimited allowing for Contact, Prospect, Data Card, Group membership or Visitor data to be returned. Data lookups are used to populate data in a form or validate if the contact is part of an email group.
36
Marketing, personalization and advertising
Consent for: Marketing, personalization and advertising
These technologies gather information about your browsing. We also work with advertising partners to serve you personalized ads online. For information on our marketing and advertising activities
visit our Global Privacy Center
Detailed description of cookies categorised as: Marketing, personalization and advertising.
Cookie
Expiry
Domain
Company
Purpose
Description
Cookie
CMID
Expiry
1 year
Domain
casalemedia.com
Company
Casale Media Inc.
Purpose
Advertising
Description
Collects data about users on behalf of Advertising platform Casale Media Inc.. The data is used to control advertisement delivery factors including how often an advert is shown and to make adjustments to their campaigns.
Cookie
CMPRO
Expiry
90 days
Domain
casalemedia.com
Company
Casale Media Inc.
Purpose
Advertising
Description
Collects data about users on behalf of Advertising platform Casale Media Inc.. The data is used to control advertisement delivery factors including how often an advert is shown and to make adjustments to their campaigns.
Cookie
CMPS
Expiry
90 days
Domain
casalemedia.com
Company
Casale Media Inc.
Purpose
Advertising
Description
Collects data about users on behalf of Advertising platform Casale Media Inc.. The data is used to control advertisement delivery factors including how often an advert is shown and to make adjustments to their campaigns.
Cookie
tuuid
Expiry
2 years
Domain
company-target.com
Company
Demandbase Inc.
Purpose
Advertising
Description
Behavioural tracking by the means of cookies, allowing for the delivery of targeted adverts.
Cookie
tuuid_lu
Expiry
2 years
Domain
company-target.com
Company
Demandbase Inc.
Purpose
Advertising
Description
Behavioural tracking by the means of cookies, allowing for the delivery of targeted adverts.
Cookie
SERVERID
Expiry
1 minute
Domain
eyeota.net
Company
Eyeota Limited
Purpose
Advertising
Description
Used by Eyeota that helps publishers maximize their audience data revenues, and empowers advertisers to target the exact audience they want. Eyeota claims to have 1 Billion Unique Global Proﬁles.
Cookie
bcookie
Expiry
2 years
Domain
linkedin.com
Company
LinkedIn Corporation
Purpose
Social networking
Description
Browser Identifier cookie to uniquely identify devices accessing LinkedIn to detect abuse on the platform
Cookie
lidc
Expiry
1 day
Domain
linkedin.com
Company
LinkedIn Corporation
Purpose
Social networking
Description
Set by social networking platform LinkedIn Corporation when you load web pages that include a panel inviting you to Follow us.
Cookie
li_gc
Expiry
2 years
Domain
linkedin.com
Company
LinkedIn Corporation
Purpose
Social networking
Description
Used to store consent of guests regarding the use of cookies for non-essential purposes
Cookie
ar_debug
Expiry
1 year
Domain
pinterest.com
Company
Pinterest
Purpose
Social networking
Description
This cookie ensures that you can share our website pages via Pinterest by means of the 'share' button.
Cookie
_pinterest_ct_ua
Expiry
1 year
Domain
ct.pinterest.com
Company
Pinterest
Purpose
Social networking
Description
This cookie ensures that you can share our website pages via Pinterest by means of the 'share' button.
Cookie
_pin_unauth
Expiry
1 year
Domain
usa.visa.com
Company
Pinterest
Purpose
Social networking
Description
This cookie ensures that you can share our website pages via Pinterest by means of the 'share' button.
Cookie
tvid
Expiry
1 year
Domain
tremorhub.com
Company
Tremor International Ltd.
Purpose
Advertising
Description
Online video advertising software company
Cookie
tv_UIDM
Expiry
1 year, 1 month
Domain
tremorhub.com
Company
Tremor International Ltd.
Purpose
Advertising
Description
Online video advertising software company
Cookie
sd-session-id
Expiry
5 years
Domain
live.rezync.com
Company
Zeta Interactive Corp.
Purpose
Advertising
Description
Uses AI to unlock consumer intent, personalise experiences and drive customer acquisition, retention and growth.
Cookie
zync-uuid
Expiry
10 years
Domain
rezync.com
Company
Zeta Interactive Corp.
Purpose
Advertising
Description
Uses AI to unlock consumer intent, personalise experiences and drive customer acquisition, retention and growth.
Cookie
demdex
Expiry
2 years
Domain
demdex.net
Company
Adobe Media Optimizer, Adobe Inc.
Purpose
Advertising
Description
Used to build unique audience profiles. The audience management capabilities in Adobe Media Optimizer integrate online and offline data from every imaginable source to deliver a unified view of all  audiences. Used by companies to quickly identify their most valuable customers and deliver targeted messages that inspire them to act.
Cookie
dpm
Expiry
2 years
Domain
dpm.demdex.net
Company
Adobe Media Optimizer, Adobe Inc.
Purpose
Advertising
Description
Used to build unique audience profiles. The audience management capabilities in Adobe Media Optimizer integrate online and offline data from every imaginable source to deliver a unified view of all  audiences. Used by companies to quickly identify their most valuable customers and deliver targeted messages that inspire them to act.
Cookie
_gcl_au
Expiry
3 months
Domain
visa.com
Company
AdSense, Google LLC
Purpose
Advertising
Description
Google AdSense gather statistics on the use of their service to help inform marketing decisions
Cookie
MSPTC
Expiry
1 year
Domain
bing.com
Company
Bing, Microsoft Corporation
Purpose
Advertising
Description
This cookie is widely used my Microsoft as a unique user identifier. It can be set by embedded microsoft scripts. Widely believed to sync across many different Microsoft domains, allowing user tracking.
Cookie
MUID
Expiry
2 years
Domain
bing.com
Company
Bing, Microsoft Corporation
Purpose
Advertising
Description
This cookie is widely used my Microsoft as a unique user identifier. It can be set by embedded microsoft scripts. Widely believed to sync across many different Microsoft domains, allowing user tracking.
Cookie
_uetsid
Expiry
30 minutes
Domain
visa.com
Company
Bing, Microsoft Corporation
Purpose
Advertising
Description
Maintains a session with Microsoft Inc. advertising platform Bing.
Cookie
_uetvid
Expiry
2 weeks, 2 days
Domain
visa.com
Company
Bing, Microsoft Corporation
Purpose
Advertising
Description
Identify an existing user by Microsoft Bing's advertising suite Universal Event Tracking.
Cookie
IDE
Expiry
2 years
Domain
doubleclick.net
Company
DoubleClick, Google LLC
Purpose
Advertising
Description
Contains a unique code to determine which advertisements have been shown on a device, on behalf of Google Inc. Advertising platform DoubleClick. Allows monitoring of the effectiveness of the ads and make the ads more relevant to the user.
Cookie
test_cookie
Expiry
15 minutes
Domain
doubleclick.net
Company
DoubleClick, Google LLC
Purpose
Advertising
Description
Tests if the user's browser supports cookies, on behalf of Google Inc. Advertising platform DoubleClick.
Cookie
_fbp
Expiry
90 days
Domain
visa.com
Company
Facebook, Meta Platforms, Inc.
Purpose
Advertising
Description
This cookie will help deliver our advertising to people who have already visited our website when they are on Facebook or a digital platform powered by Facebook Advertising.
Cookie
data-rk
Expiry
1 year
Domain
media.net
Company
Media.Net, Beijing ShuZhi Technology Co.,Ltd.
Purpose
Advertising
Description
Contextual advertising
Cookie
eud
Expiry
2 years, 5 months
Domain
rfihub.com
Company
Rocket Fuel, Amazon Europe Core S.a.r.l.
Purpose
Advertising
Description
Collects anonymous user data on behalf of Advertising platform Rocket Fuel, Inc.. Information such as which ads have been shown and on which pages, whether the user clicked them, IP address, whether the user purchased an item from a partner of Rocket Fuel, Inc.. This information is used with proprietary technology to target audiences and deliver personalized ads.
Cookie
euds
Expiry
Session
Domain
rfihub.com
Company
Rocket Fuel, Amazon Europe Core S.a.r.l.
Purpose
Advertising
Description
Collects anonymous user data on behalf of Advertising platform Rocket Fuel, Inc.. Information such as which ads have been shown and on which pages, whether the user clicked them, IP address, whether the user purchased an item from a partner of Rocket Fuel, Inc.. This information is used with proprietary technology to target audiences and deliver personalized ads.
Cookie
rud
Expiry
2 years, 5 months
Domain
rfihub.com
Company
Rocket Fuel, Amazon Europe Core S.a.r.l.
Purpose
Advertising
Description
Collects anonymous user data on behalf of Advertising platform Rocket Fuel, Inc.. Information such as which ads have been shown and on which pages, whether the user clicked them, IP address, whether the user purchased an item from a partner of Rocket Fuel, Inc.. This information is used with proprietary technology to target audiences and deliver personalized ads.
Cookie
ruds
Expiry
Session
Domain
rfihub.com
Company
Rocket Fuel, Amazon Europe Core S.a.r.l.
Purpose
Advertising
Description
Collects anonymous user data on behalf of Advertising platform Rocket Fuel, Inc.. Information such as which ads have been shown and on which pages, whether the user clicked them, IP address, whether the user purchased an item from a partner of Rocket Fuel, Inc.. This information is used with proprietary technology to target audiences and deliver personalized ads.
Cookie
muc_ads
Expiry
2 years
Domain
t.co
Company
Twitter, X Corp.
Purpose
Social networking
Description
Collects anonymous data and monitors how users navigate and interact with the Site and Services of real-time information networking platform Twitter, Inc.. The aim is to customize and improve the Services.
Cookie
personalization_id
Expiry
2 years
Domain
twitter.com
Company
Twitter, X Corp.
Purpose
Social networking
Description
Collects anonymous data and monitors how users navigate and interact with the Site and Services of real-time information networking platform Twitter, Inc.. The aim is to customise and improve the Services.
Cookie
VISITOR_INFO1_LIVE
Expiry
240 days
Domain
youtube.com
Company
YouTube, Google LLC
Purpose
Advertising
Description
Remembers if YouTube should show the new-style or old-style video interface to you.
Cookie
VISITOR_PRIVACY_METADATA
Expiry
180 days
Domain
youtube.com
Company
YouTube, Google LLC
Purpose
Social networking
Description
Indicates acceptance of YouTube's privacy review
Cookie
YSC
Expiry
Session
Domain
youtube.com
Company
YouTube, Google LLC
Purpose
Social networking
Description
A unique identifier given to site visitor when viewing a video.
Cookie Notice
For more information about the use of cookies, please see the
Visa Cookie Notice
.
Powered by
Digital Control Room
Sub-policy 3
https://www.checkout.com/legal/privacy-policy:
Products
Connect
Global payments network
Move
Payins and payouts
Protect
Fraud, risk, & compliance
Boost
Payment performance
Manage
Money movement controls
Back
Connect
Accept Online
Process online payments your way.
Unified Payments API
Connect to Checkout.com via a single API.
Flow
Boost conversion with customizable blocks.
Hosted Payment Page
Let Checkout.com host your payment page.
Mobile SDK
Build native mobile checkout experiences.
Payments Links
Accept payments on any channel.
Plugins
Plug your payments into platforms.
Back
Move
Acquiring
Accept payments globally with local acquiring.
Payment Methods
Process payments with cards, wallets, transfers, and vouchers.
Issuing
Create your own physical and virtual cards.
Payouts
Move money directly to bank accounts and cards.
Back
Protect
Fraud Detection
Detect and deter payment fraud.
Authentication
Simplify authentication and compliance.
Identity Verification
Verify identities, docs, and KYC with AI-powered video.
Disputes
Protect against chargebacks and manage disputes.
Vault
Protect, store, enrich, and exchange your payment data.
Back
Boost
Intelligent Acceptance
Boost your revenue with AI-powered optimizations.
Network Tokens
Deploy advanced payment security and encryption.
Real-Time Account Updater
Keep payments flowing for subscriptions and more.
Back
Manage
Dashboard
Orchestrate payments and finances in one place.
Treasury & FX
Refine financial and cash flow management.
Solutions
Use Cases
Industry-specific applications
Our Ecosystem
Global connectivity
Use Cases
eCommerce
Retail, fashion, consumer goods, and digital services
Fintech
Neobanks, money transfer, trading, and insurance
Gaming
Sports, e-sports, game streaming, and virtual reality
Crypto
Exchanges and wallets
Marketplaces
Multi-sided markets and platforms
Payment Facilitators
Fintechs and financial service providers
Travel
Online booking platforms, agents and supplier partners
Our ecosystem
International Coverage
One powerful network to scale your business.
Our Partners
Tech stack partners and plugin payment options.
Documentation & Resources
Documentation
Technical references
Resources
Support and education
Documentation
Documentation
Explore step-by-step guides and technical know-how.
API Reference
Get started with a comprehensive API guide.
Test Account
Play, test, simulate, and access the latest features.
Trust Center
Review our security practices and compliance standards.
Resources
Blog
Explore expert perspectives, guides, and reports.
Case Studies
Discover real-world success stories from leading brands.
Newsroom
Read our press releases and download our press kit.
Support
Get help and answers to all your questions.
Company
About Us
Business information
People & Careers
Opportunities and experiences
About Us
Our Mission
Learn how we help businesses to thrive in the digital economy.
Our Customers
See what we do for the world’s leading businesses.
Featured stories
Explore a curated selection of news, case studies, and articles.
Contact Us
Speak to us to discover high-performance payments.
People & Careers
Life at checkout.com
Join our team of passionate payments experts.
Careers at Checkout.com
Explore open roles and opportunities.
Diversity & Inclusion
See how we invest in diversity, equity, and more.
Sign In
Get in touch
Would you like to change your region to see content specific to your location?
Global (English)
Select your location
Products and features may vary by country
COUNTRIES
France (Français)
Germany (Deutsch)
Spain (Español)
Italy (italiano)
United Arab Emirates (اللغة العربية)
Saudi Arabia (اللغة العربية)
Portugal (Português)
China (中文)
Continue
Legal
Transparency is a recurring Checkout.com value that is reflected in our pricing promise, our security protocol and our legal agreements.
Terms & policies
Service Terms
Country Terms
Privacy Policy
Cookie policy
Regulatory
RDR terms
Disclaimer
Payment methods rules
Claims processing
Checkout.com Privacy Notice
This notice was last updated on 2 January 2024.
Checkout provides services which help businesses thrive in the digital economy. These services include payment processing and optimization, tools to manage and reduce fraud, and identity verification solutions. This notice is designed to provide you with clear information about how we use personal data when we provide our services, so that you can continue to trust Checkout to handle your data fairly, lawfully, and securely. We want to make sure you understand what personal data we may collect about you when you interact with us, how we use your personal data, and how we keep it safe. Personal data means data from which you can be identified either directly (e.g. via your name) or indirectly (e.g. via your IP address).
If you have any questions about how we use your personal data, you can get in touch by one of the methods set out in the
Contact us
section.
This is a global notice that applies to the activities of The Checkout.com group, which includes Checkout Ltd and all affiliated companies (“Checkout”, “we”, “our”, or “us”). The Checkout entity which is the data controller and therefore primarily responsible for your personal data will depend on which Checkout entity has provided you with our services in your jurisdiction. You can find details of the relevant Checkout entities
here
.
You can scroll down to read the entire notice, or you can jump to the section you are interested in by clicking on one of the headings below:
What personal data do we collect?
The purposes for which we process personal data and our lawful basis for doing so
Your choices and rights
How we share your personal data with third parties
International data transfers
How we protect your personal data
Contact us & updates to this notice
Biometric Data
Country-specific notices
Link
What personal data do we collect?
The personal data we collect, and the ways in which we process it depend on your relationship with us. This notice relates to the information we process about you if you are:
A Merchant Representative:
you represent the businesses and prospective businesses that we support.
A Merchant Customer:
you are an individual customer who purchases goods and services from our Merchants, applies for a card issued by Checkout, or uses our verification services
A Website User:
you are a visitor to our website, including utilising our sandbox environment
This notice applies where Checkout act as a data controller, but we may sometimes operate as a data processor for Merchant Customer data where we carry out instructions and process data on a Merchant’s behalf. In these instances, you should refer to the privacy notice of the Merchant for details regarding how they process your information.
‍
Merchant Representatives:
Data we collect
Where we collect it
Contact information: your name, job title, email address, phone number, personal or business postal address
-Where you provide it to us by enquiring about, or registering for, our services
-From certain trusted third parties, for example those with whom you may have shared your data, and companies which aggregate business contact information
-From publicly available sources, for example
Companies House
in the UK
Sensitive information: proof of address, copy of a personal identification card or passport, financial information and other information as required to validate your identity and background
-Where you provide it to us directly in the course of registering a Merchant for our services
-From certain trusted third parties, for example those with whom you may have shared your data, including companies which provide information on company directors and shareholding
‍
Merchant Customers:
Data we collect
Where we collect it
Contact information: your name, email address, phone number, personal or business postal address
Where you make a purchase through a Merchant that uses Checkout to process payments, utilize a physical or virtual card issued by Checkout, or use our verification services
Cardholder information: your payment card details and billing address
Where you make a purchase through a Merchant that uses Checkout to process payments or utilize a physical or virtual card issued by Checkout
Transaction information: information relating to a purchase, including currency, amount, and the identity of the Merchant
Where you make a purchase through a Merchant that uses Checkout to process payments or utilize a physical or virtual card issued by Checkout
Technical information: your IP address and device information (including the type of browser and operating system and version you use, unique device identifier, and mobile network information)
Where you make a purchase through a Merchant that uses Checkout to process payments, or use our verification services
Verification information: proof of address, copy of a personal identification card or passport and other information as required to validate your identity
Where you apply for a physical or virtual card issued by Checkout or use our verification services
Audio visual and, subject to your consent, biometric information: any videos, images, copies of relevant identity documents, face and voice recordings, from which biometric data such as a faceprint, or a voiceprint, can be extracted
Where you upload this information while validating your identity using Checkout’s identity verification services
Sensitive information: your payment card details, copies of relevant identity documents, and biometric data derived from images of you (for example, an image of your face from a face scan), copies of personal identification cards or passport and other information as required to validate your identity
Where you make a purchase through a Merchant that uses Checkout to process payments or utilize a physical or virtual card issued by Checkout
Where you upload this information while validating your identity using Checkout’s identity verification services
Where you apply for a physical or virtual card issued by Checkout or use our verification services
Please note that where you are a Merchant Customer you should also consult the privacy notice of the Merchant from whom you are making a purchase to understand how they may process and share your personal data.
‍
Website Users:
Data we collect
Where we collect it
Technical information: IP address and device information (including the type of browser and operating system and version you use, unique device identifier and mobile network information) and your activity when using this website including information on your access times to this website (for example time zone settings and location), pages viewed, URLs clicked on and the pages you visited before and after navigating to this website
We use cookies, server logs and other technologies, such as web beacons, to collect this information. Please refer to our Cookies Notice for further information about how we use cookies and similar technologies.
Contact information: your name, email address, phone number, personal or business postal address
Where you provide it to us directly by using an enquiry or event sign up form on our website
‍
The purposes for which we process personal data and our lawful basis for doing so
‍
Merchant Representatives
Purposes for which we process data
Our lawful basis
We use your contact information to facilitate and enable our relationship with you as a prospective, new or existing merchant
We use your contact information to send you marketing communications via email or text about relevant products and services
We process this information based on our legitimate interest in contacting you to in the course of offering or providing relevant products and services to you
Where required by law we rely on your consent in order to send you direct marketing
We use your verification information, in order to validate your identity, fulfill our regulatory obligations, and conduct due diligence in the form of Know Your Customer (“KYC”) or Know Your Business (“KYB”) checks
We process this information where it is necessary to comply with a legal obligation
We also process this information where it is in our legitimate interests to do so to detect and prevent fraud and money laundering
We use your contact information and verification information to comply with our legal and regulatory obligations
We process this information where it is necessary to comply with a legal obligation
We anonymize and aggregate your information and process it to ensure the
security, stability, performance and development of our services
We process this information where it is in our legitimate interests to do so to securely and effectively maintain and develop our products and services
‍
Merchant Customers
Purposes for which we process data
Our lawful basis
We use your contact, cardholder, transaction, technical and verification information to process payments and otherwise provide our services to you
We process this information where it is in our legitimate interests to do so to securely and effectively deliver our services
We use your contact, cardholder, transaction, technical and verification information to detect and prevent fraudulent activity, financial crime and any other illegal or unauthorized use of Checkout services
We process this information where it is necessary to comply with a legal obligation
We also process this information where it is in our legitimate interests to do so to detect and prevent fraud and money laundering
We use your contact, cardholder, transaction, technical and verification information to comply with our legal and regulatory obligations
We process this information where it is necessary to comply with a legal obligation
We use your contact, and audio visual and biometric information to validate your identity (when using Checkout’s Identity Verification Services)
We process this information where it is necessary for the performance of a contract
We only process biometric information with your explicit consent
We anonymize and aggregate your information and process it to ensure the
security, stability, performance and development of our services
We process this information where it is in our legitimate interests to do so to securely and effectively maintain and develop our products and services
‍
Website Users
Purposes for which we process data
Our lawful basis
We use your technical information to perform data analytics to improve and optimize our website, products, services, marketing, customer relationships and experiences as further described in our Cookies Notice
We process this information where it is in our legitimate interests to do so to securely and effectively maintain and develop our website
Where we use certain types of cookies, we will ask for your consent. We explain this further in our
Cookies Notice
We use your technical information to administer and protect our website (including troubleshooting, data analysis, testing, system maintenance, support, reporting and hosting of data)
We process this information where it is in our legitimate interests to do so to protect and secure our website
We use your contact information to respond to you where you make an enquiry on our website
We process this information where it is in our legitimate interests to do so in responding to your enquiries
‍
Automated decision making and profiling
In the course of providing our services, we may make decisions using your data which are partially or wholly automated to help make our decisions and services secure and efficient.
We use automated decision-making in the following circumstances:
-Fraud detection: Where you are a Merchant Customer and you initiate a transaction with a Merchant that uses our fraud detection services, your information may be processed by Checkout for the purposes of fraud detection and prevention. In some cases, this may lead to an automated decision for a transaction to be declined or for further information to be requested from you in order to proceed. We perform this activity where we have a legal obligation to do so to protect you and our Merchants, and to otherwise ensure the security of our services. Any such automated decision will be based on your contact, cardholder, transaction, and technical information, as further outlined in the
What personal data do we collect
section of this notice.
-Identity verification: Where you are a Merchant Representative or Merchant Customer and we ask you to provide identity information to sign up to one of our services, or you use our
identity verification
product, the information you provide may be subject to partially or wholly automated decisions as to whether we are able to verify your identity. In the event we are unable to effectively verify your identity, this could have the impact of delaying or denying you access to a product or service operated by Checkout or one of our Merchants. We perform this activity to ensure we comply with our own legal obligations, or on our Merchants’ behalf where they use our identity verification product.  We use verification information to perform these checks, as well as any audio, visual and biometric information you submit to our Identity verification product, as further outlined in the
What personal data do we collect
section of this notice.
You have a right to object to any automated decisions we have made and request that any such decisions are reviewed by a human. For information on how to exercise this right please see
Your Choices and Rights.
‍
Your choices and rights
You have rights and choices over the way your information is used by us:
Right to opt-out of direct marketing communications: This enables you to opt-out of receiving marketing communications from us. You can do this at any time by clicking on the ‘unsubscribe’ link included in any email marketing material we send to you, or by informing us by emailing
dpo@checkout.com
Right to request access to your personal data: This enables you to receive a copy of the personal data we hold about you and to check that we are lawfully processing it. In some cases, you have a right to receive a copy of this information in a reusable format and have it transmitted to another organisation
Right to request correction of the personal data we hold about you: This enables you to have any incomplete or inaccurate data we hold about you corrected
Right to request erasure of your personal data: This enables you to ask us to delete or remove your personal data. Please note that in some cases, for example if we need to retain your data to comply with legal obligations, we may be unable to comply with such requests
Right to object to processing of your personal data: In addition to your right to object to direct marketing communications, in certain circumstances you can object to our processing of your personal data for example when we rely on legitimate interests to process your personal data
Request restriction of processing of your personal data: This enables you to ask us to suspend the processing of your personal data in certain scenarios
Withdrawal of consent: You can withdraw consent at any time where we are relying on consent to process your personal data
Right to object to automated individual decision-making and profiling: This includes the right to request human intervention where we have relied on automated decision making or profiling.
If you wish to exercise any of the rights set out above, or any additional rights noted in the
Country-specific
section of this notice, please contact
dpo@checkout.com
. You can also submit a request via an authorized representative, in which case we will confirm the representative has authority to act on your behalf before we carry out the request.
If you object to the processing of your personal data, or if you have provided your consent to processing and you later choose to withdraw it, we will respect that choice in accordance with our legal obligations. However, this could mean that we cannot provide certain products or services to you or we cannot perform the actions necessary to achieve the purposes described (see
The purposes for which we process your personal data
).
‍
How we share your personal data with third parties
In order to provide our services to you we may share your personal data with the following parties:
Members of the Checkout Group: Your information may be shared with our affiliates within the Checkout.com group, to provide you with our services.
Third party service providers: We may also use third-party service providers acting on our behalf. These service providers help us with data and cloud services, website hosting, data analysis, background and screening, application services, advertising networks, information technology and related infrastructure, customer service, communications, and auditing.
Payment partners: We may share your personal data with third parties across the payments ecosystem as necessary to securely and effectively process payments. This includes banks, card schemes, alternative payment method providers and issuers.
Law enforcement and regulators: We may share information in response to a law enforcement, government agency or regulator request where permitted to or required by law. We may also share information when we or a third party is investigating potential fraud.
We may also share your personal data with third parties in the event of any reorganization, merger, sale, joint venture, assignment, transfer or other disposition or any other transaction affecting all or any portion of our business, assets or stock.
Checkout.com does not sell personal data to third parties.
‍
International data transfers
Checkout is a global business and in the provision of our services personal data may be transferred to Checkout group companies or third-party service providers located in a different country than your home country.  We will implement appropriate measures to ensure that your personal data remains protected and secure when it is transferred, and we will only transfer your personal data in accordance with applicable laws and regulations. Where data is transferred from the UK or EEA to a third country that is not deemed by the EU Commission or UK Secretary of State to have adequate protections in place, we rely on the EU Standard Contractual Clauses (SCCs) or contractual clauses approved by the ICO (such as the UK Addendum to the EU SCCs) respectively, to transfer your data to that third country and ensure it remains secure. We also carry out transfer impact assessments before transferring your personal data, to assess the level of risk to you and your rights and protections in that third country.
You can find the EU SCCs
here
and the UK Addendum to the EU SCCs
here
.  Please
Contact us
if you would like to know more about how we transfer your personal data overseas.
‍
How we protect your personal data
Checkout is committed to building a secure and trusted environment for businesses and their communities to thrive in the digital economy. Whilst we cannot guarantee your personal data will be 100% secure, we put in place appropriate measures to secure personal data from being accidentally lost, used, accessed, altered or disclosed in an unauthorized manner. We continually review the security measures we have in place to ensure they are appropriate.
We are PCI DSS (Payment Card Industry Data Security Standard) Level 1 compliant, which is the highest standard set by the payment card industry to ensure that cardholder data is processed, stored, and transmitted in a secure environment. Checkout’s systems are also ISO27001 certified.
When deciding how long to keep your personal data, we think about how much and what kind of personal data we have, how sensitive it is, the risk of unauthorized use or disclosure, why we are using your personal data, and if there is another way to achieve these purposes, as well as what the laws and regulations tell us. We will only retain your personal data for as long as reasonably necessary to fulfil the following purposes:
-to comply with any legal, accounting, tax and reporting requirements
-to deliver and develop our products and services securely and effectively
-to perform analysis and undertake internal research
Once the data is no longer required for these purposes, we securely erase it.
‍
Contact us & updates to this notice
If you have any questions about this notice, including any requests to exercise your legal rights, please contact our Data Protection Officer (DPO) using the details set out below.
Email address:
dpo@checkout.com
Postal Address:
Data Protection Officer, Checkout Ltd
Wenlock Works, Shepherdess Walk,
London,
N1 7BQ
United Kingdom
‍
You can also contact or complain to your local supervisory authority (for example the UK Information Commissioner’s Office (ICO)
here
), however please consider contacting us first so that we can address your question directly.
‍
Biometric Data
If you consent to our collection of biometric information or if our collection of biometric information is otherwise permitted by law, you agree that we may collect your imagery of the face, and voice recordings, from which an identifier template such as a faceprint, a minutiae template, or a voiceprint, can be extracted in order to verify your identity using Checkout’s verification services.  Your biometric information may be shared with our third party cloud providers Outscale SAS and Amazon Web Services.  We will delete your biometric information no later than 365 days after the date you provide it.
‍
Country-specific notices
Notice relating to our operations under the California Consumer Privacy Act as amended by the California Privacy Rights Act (collectively, “CCPA”)
Checkout.com is providing the following supplemental information for individuals whose personal data is collected or held by Checkout LLC in the State of California as defined in the CCPA.
Your right to access the personal information we hold about you.
You may request a copy of the personal information that we have collected about you
Your right to request the deletion of your personal information.
Subject to certain limitations under applicable law, you may request that we delete the personal confirmation we have collected from you.
Non-discrimination.
You have the right not to be discriminated against for exercising any of your rights under CCPA.
Authorized Agent
. Only you, or someone legally authorized to act on your behalf, may make a verifiable consumer request related to your personal information. You may also make a verifiable consumer request on behalf of your minor child. To authorize an agent, provide written authorization signed by you and your designated agent, and contact us as set forth in “Contact us & updates to this notice” below.
Verification.
To protect your privacy, we will take steps to reasonably verify your identity before fulfilling your request. These steps may involve asking you to provide sufficient information that allows us to reasonably verify you are the person about whom we collected personal information or an authorized representative, or to answer questions regarding your account and use of our Services.
“Do Not Track.”
Do Not Track (“DNT”) is a privacy preference that users can set in certain web browsers. Please note that we do not respond to or honor DNT signals or similar mechanisms transmitted by web browsers.
Your right to opt-out of cross-context behavioral advertising.
You may opt-out of the sharing of your personal information for cross-context behavioral advertising. Please click the link
here
or contact us at dpo@checkout.com to submit a request to opt-out of cross-context behavioral advertising
Sale of personal information:
Checkout does not sell personal information, as such we do not knowingly sell personal information relating to minors
Contact.
To submit a request to exercise any of your rights, you can contact our Data Protection Officer using the contact details provided above.
‍
Notice relating to our operations under the Colorado Privacy Act (“CPA”)
Checkout.com is providing the following supplemental information for individuals whose personal data is collected or held by Checkout LLC in the State of Colorado as defined in the CPA.
Processing of Sensitive Information
. In some situations, we may need your explicit consent to process your sensitive personal information (e.g., government issued identification, biometric information, financial information) for the purpose of providing Services and/or other purposes stated in this Privacy Notice, in each case as required by applicable law.
‍
Notice relating to our operations in France
Checkout.com is providing the following supplemental information for individuals whose personal information is collected or held by Checkout SAS or any of its affiliated companies.
‍
Instruction on the processing of your Personal Data after your death
. For data subjects in France or if your data is processed by Checkout SAS, you have the right to issue general or specific instructions regarding the fate of your Personal Data after your death, in accordance with the terms of Article 85 of French Law No. 78-17.
Email Address
Thank you! Your submission has been received!
Oops! Something went wrong while submitting the form.
Cookies and use of our website
We may use your information – collected through cookies and similar technologies - to improve your experience on our site, analyze how you use it and assist in our marketing efforts. You can always update your preferences via the Cookie settings page. We will handle your personal information in line with our
Privacy Policy
and Cookie policy
Reject All
Accept All Cookies
Cookies Settings
Cookies Settings
When you visit our website we may store or retrieve information on your browser, mostly in the form of cookies. This information might be about you, your preferences or your device and is used to make our site work as you expect, to analyse how you interact with it and to improve your experience by giving you a more personalised experience. We respect your right to privacy and you can, at any time, choose to disable some types of cookies. Click on the different category headings to find out more and to set your default settings. Please be aware that blocking some types of cookies may impact your experience of the site and the services we are able to offer.
Cookie policy
Allow All
Manage Consent Preferences
Always Active
These cookies are essential to enable you to move around a website and use its features. Without these cookies, services you have asked for cannot be provided.
View Vendor Details‎
Performance Cookies
These allow us to recognise and count the number of visitors and to see how visitors move around our website when they are using it. This helps us to improve the way our website works, for example, by ensuring that users are finding what they are looking for easily.
View Vendor Details‎
Functional Cookies
These are used to recognise you when you return to our website. This enables us to personalise our content for you, greet you by name and remember your preferences (for example, your choice of language or region).
View Vendor Details‎
Targeting Cookies
These cookies may be set through our site by our advertising partners. They may be used by those companies to build a profile of your interests and show you relevant adverts on other sites. They are based on uniquely identifying your browser and internet device. If you do not allow these cookies, you will experience less targeted advertising.
View Vendor Details‎
Back Button
Vendors List
Search Icon
Filter Icon
Clear
checkbox label
label
Apply
Cancel
Consent
Leg.Interest
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
Sub-policy 4
https://www.mashreqbank.com/en/uae/personal/transparency/privacy-notice/:
Cookie Policy
We use cookies to provide you with a safe and personalized browsing experience. You can change your cookies preferences at any time.
Learn more
Decline
Accept
Cookie preferences
You need to enable JavaScript to run this app.
NEO
EMIRATI
GOLD
PRIVATE
NEO BIZ
BUSINESS
CORPORATE
INTERNATIONAL
MASHREQ AL ISLAMI
عربى
UAE
Egypt
Pakistan
Qatar
Oman
Bahrain
Kuwait
India
Hong Kong
UK - London
USA - New York
Shanghai
Nepal
Bangladesh
About Us
ATM & Branches
Customer Care
Inquiry
Feedback
Complaint
Accounts
Cards
Loans
Transfers
Investments
Insurance
Offers
Refer & Earn
Accounts
Get Instant Account
View all
Current Account
NEO Current Account
Kids Account
NEO NXT
Savings Account
NEO Savings Account
NEO Plus Savings Account
Mashreq noon Savings Account
Money Multiplier Account
Daily Bonus Account
Easy Saver Account
Dream Saver Account
Nature Saver Account
Community Deposit
NEO Groups
Non-Resident Account
Non-Resident Egyptian Account
Foreign Currency Account
Multi Currency Accounts
Term Deposit
Fixed Deposit
Unfixed Deposit
Mashreq Millionaire
Mashreq Millionaire
Winners List
Credit & Debit Cards
Get instant credit card
View all
Credit Card
Solitaire
Platinum Elite
Cashback
noon
Debit Card
NEO
Mashreq noon Savings Account
Loan on Card
Flash Cash
Loans
For the planned & the unexpected
View all
Personal Loan
Personal Loan for Existing Customers
Personal Loan for New Customers
NEO Credit Instant Loan
Debt Consolidation Loan
Top-up Loan For Existing Customers
Home Loan
Home Loan for Residents
Home Loan for Non-Residents
Green Home Loan
Auto Loan
CashIn Car Loan
Loan on Card
Flash Cash
Transfers
Fast, convenient & transparent
View all
International Transfer
Quick Remit
Swift Transfers
Local Transfer
Local Money Transfer
Aani Instant Payments
Foreign Exchange
Multi Currency Accounts
Foreign Currency Exchange
Investments
Investing made easy
View all
Investments
UAE Equities
International Equities
Thematic Investments
Gold & Silver Edge Account
Insurance
We will cover the IF, so you can enjoy the LIFE
View all
Life & accident
Term Life Insurance
Whole Of Life Insurance
Digital Term and Critical Illness Insurance
Income Shield Insurance
Secure Plus Insurance
Protect 360 Insurance
Salary Protect
LifeStyle Protect
Expat Protect
Multi Protect
Income Shield - Sukoon
Savings Plan
Savings Solutions
Health
Critical Illness Plan
Hospital Cash Plan
Critical Illness Care Plus
Womens Protect
Motor, Home & Pet
Motor Insurance
Home Contents and Personal Belongings
Pet Insurance
Travel Insurance
Offers
For all your offers
View all
Offers
Credit Card
Debit Card
Salary Transfer
Early Bird Cashback
Insurance
Rewards
Mashreq Vantage
Refer & Earn
Refer & win big!
Refer & Earn
Accounts
Sign In
Online Banking
Individual account
Business account
MashreqMATRIX
Mashreq NEO CORP
Other Banking Services
Mashreq E-Trade
Mashreq FI Online
Become A Customer
Privacy Notice
WHO WE ARE AND HOW TO CONTACT US?
Mashreqbank PSC respects your privacy and is committed to protecting it. We provide this Privacy Notice to inform you of our privacy procedures and practices, including what personal information we collect about you, how we obtain your personal information and how we use your personal information. “Personal information” means information that is about you or from which we can identify you.

Mashreqbank PSC shall protect the personal information that you provide in compliance with our Data Privacy Policies which are in line with the applicable Data Privacy Laws (“Laws”) and it's implementing rules and regulations. We are the data controller of this information under the Laws and other relevant data protection regulations because in the context of our business relationship with you we decide how and why your personal information is processed in the ways explained in this Privacy Notice. When we use terms such as “we”, “us” and “our” in this Privacy Notice, we mean Mashreq Bank PSC and Mashreq Capital (DIFC) Limited (if you are a customer of Mashreq Capital).

We may be required to update or change the Privacy Notice from time to time. We will upload an updated Privacy Notice on www.mashreqbank.com and / or other Mashreq websites. If there are any significant changes to the Privacy Notice (e.g. if we decide to use your personal information in a manner different from that stated at the time it was collected), we will notify you by way of an email.
HAVE YOU BEEN INTRODUCED TO US BY A BROKER OR OTHER INTERMEDIARY?
Our products and services are available through our own branches and on our own website as well as through professional and financial advisors and anyone else who acts as a person sitting in between you and us in relation to what we do for you. In this Privacy Notice we will call these persons “brokers and other intermediaries”. When a broker or other intermediary processes your personal information on our behalf, this Privacy Notice will apply and you should contact us to exercise your rights under the Laws. When a broker or other intermediary processes your personal information as a data controller (i.e. they decide how and why your personal information is processed), their own privacy notice will apply and you should ask them for a copy if you do not have one by the time you are introduced to us.
WHAT KINDS OF PERSONAL INFORMATION ABOUT YOU DO WE PROCESS?
This will depend on the products or services you apply for and (if your application is successful) obtain from us. We set out below the personal information that we generally process in connection with all our products and services, followed by the personal information that we generally process in connection with specific products and services.
PERSONAL INFORMATION THAT WE GENERALLY PROCESS IN CONNECTION WITH ALL OUR PRODUCTS AND SERVICES
This includes:
Your title, full name, signature, and contact details, including for instance your email address, home and mobile telephone numbers and fax number;
Your home address, correspondence address (where different from your home address) and address history;
Your date of birth and/or age, e.g. to make sure that you are eligible to apply for the product and/or that it is suitable for you;
Your place of birth, nationality, residency details and any other citizenships if this is necessary for us to comply with our legal and regulatory requirements;
Your government identification number and identification documents including for instance document type, number, country of issue and expiry date;
Records of how you have contacted us and, if you get in touch with us online, details such as your mobile phone location data, IP address and MAC address;
Details of your marital status, spouse’s name and account information, dependents, beneficiaries, beneficial owners, representatives, indemnifiers, tax status, sources of income and funds, assets and liabilities, and whether you are a politically exposed person;
Details of shareholdings, prominent functions, directorships and/or employment including for instance your occupation, salary, employer and length of service;
Details of your products and services including for instance application information, customer ID number, account number, account balance and currency, account history, security or collateral held by us, your branch name, standing orders, direct debits, payment transactions, cards held, card numbers, details of additional signatories, online banking details, information relating to complaints and/or fraud reports, and details associated with account closure and/or card cancellation; and
Security identifiers including for instance mother’s maiden name.
To comply with our legal obligations, we may be required to share your personal information with regulatory bodies governing the jurisdiction, such as the UAE Central Bank.
WHAT IS THE SOURCE OF YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION?
We will generally collect your personal information from you directly. If you are introduced to us by an approved intermediary, we will obtain some personal information about you indirectly from them when they introduce you to us.

In addition, we obtain your personal information from other sources such as fraud prevention agencies, credit reference agencies, your employer, landlord, other lenders, publicly available directories and information (e.g. telephone directory, social media, internet, news articles), debt recovery and/or tracing agents, other organisations to assist in prevention and detection of crime, police and law enforcement agencies. In addition, some of your personal information may come from other members of our Group if you already have a product with them.

Some of the personal information obtained from Credit Reference Agencies will have originated from publicly accessible sources. In particular, credit reference agencies draw on court decisions, bankruptcy registers and the electoral register (also known as the electoral roll). We explain more about Credit Reference Agencies below. We have also mentioned above in the lists of personal information that we process some of the Credit Reference Agencies’ other sources of information (which are our own source of information too).
WHAT ARE THE PURPOSES AND LEGAL GROUNDS FOR OUR PROCESSING OF YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION (INCLUDING WHEN WE SHARE IT WITH OTHERS) ?
Certain Laws require us to explain what legal grounds justify our processing of your personal information (including when we share it with other organisations). For some processing more than one legal ground may be relevant (except where we rely on a consent). Here are the legal grounds that are relevant to us in accordance with applicable Laws:
Processing is necessary to perform our contract with you or for taking steps prior to entering into it for the purpose of:
Administering and managing your account(s) and related services, updating your records, tracing your whereabouts to contact you about your account and doing this for recovering debt;
Sharing your personal information with other payment services providers such as when you ask us to share information about your account with them; and
All stages and activities relevant to managing your account(s) including enquiry, application, administration and management of accounts, illustrations, requests for transfers of equity, and setting up/changing/removing guarantors
Where we consider that, on balance, it is appropriate for us do so, and where we are able to do so in line with applicable Laws, processing necessary for the following legitimate interests which apply to us and in some cases other organisations (who we list below) are:
Administering and managing your account(s) and services relating to that, updating your records, tracing your whereabouts to contact you about your account and doing this for recovering debt, to assess your credit worthiness and advise you in relation to products and services;
Testing the performance of our products, services and internal processes;
Adhering to guidance and best practice under the regimes of governmental and regulatory bodies such as the Dubai Financial Services Authority, the UAE Central Bank or any other relevant authority where we operate;
For management and auditing of our business operations including accounting and insurance;
Carrying out searches at Credit Reference Agencies pre-application, at the application stage, and periodically after that. Where you have been introduced to us by a broker or other intermediary they may do these searches on our behalf;
Carrying out monitoring and to keep records (see below);
Administering our good governance requirements and those of other members of our Group;
When we share your personal information with these other people or organisations;
Your guarantor (if you have one);
Joint account holders, trustees and beneficiaries and any person with power of attorney over your affairs (in each case only if relevant to you);
Members of our Group;
Other payment services providers such as when you ask us to share information about your account with them;
Other account holders or individuals when we have to provide your information to them because some money paid to you by them should not be in your account;
Our legal and other professional advisers, auditors and actuaries;
Financial institutions and trade associations;
Tax authorities who are overseas for instance if you are subject to tax in another jurisdiction we may share your personal information directly with relevant tax authorities overseas;
Other organisations and businesses who provide services to us such as debt recovery agencies, back up and server hosting providers, communication tool providers, IT software and maintenance providers, document storage providers and suppliers of other back office functions;
Buyers and their professional representatives as part of any restructuring or sale of our business or assets; and
Credit Reference Agencies (see below where we explain more)
Processing is necessary to comply with our legal obligations:
For compliance with laws that apply to us;
For establishment, defence and enforcement of our legal rights or those of any other member of our Group;
For activities relating to the prevention, detection and investigation of crime;
To carry out identity checks, anti-money laundering checks, and checks with Fraud Prevention Agencies pre-application, at the application stage, and periodically after that. Where you have been introduced to us by a broker or other intermediary they may do these searches on our behalf.
To carry out monitoring and to keep records (see below);
To deal with requests from you to exercise your rights under the Laws;
To process information about a crime or offence and proceedings related to that (in practice this will be relevant if we know or suspect fraud); and
When we share your personal information with these other people or organisations:
Your guarantor (if you have one);
Joint account holders, Trustees and beneficiaries, and the person with power of attorney over your affairs;
Government and regulatory bodies, such as the UAE Central Bank;
Other payment services providers such as when you ask us to share information about your account with them;
Other account holders or individuals when we have to provide your information to them because some money paid to you by them should not be in your account; and
Fraud Prevention Agencies and Law enforcement agencies.
Where required under certain Laws, processing with your consent:
When you request that we share your personal information with someone else and you give us your consent to such disclosure;
For personalising the marketing messages we send to you and to make them more relevant. This can be done in the following ways: carrying out marketing research and analysis and developing statistics; using market research organisations who help us to develop and improve our products and services; providing you with relevant marketing communications (including by email, telephone or SMS) relating to the products and services that you have with us or that we offer; and measuring the effectiveness of our marketing communications; and
For some of our processing of special categories of personal data such as biometric data, data about your health or if you are a vulnerable customer (and it will be explained to you when we ask for that explicit consent, for what purposes, with whom it will be shared and what it will be used for).
HOW AND WHEN CAN YOU WITHDRAW YOUR CONSENT?
For processing that is based on your consent, you have the right to take back that consent for future processing at any time (unless the personal data is required for our business operations related to the provisions of products and services to you). You can do this by contacting us using the details provided in
below
.

We will tell the broker or other intermediary who introduced you to us that you have withdrawn your consent if it is our data processor (this means an organisation who is processing personal information on our behalf) or if we are required to do when you exercise certain rights under the Laws. You should make sure to contact them directly to withdraw your consent for what they do with your personal information as a data controller in their own right.

To comply with payment services regulations, we have to share some of your personal information with other payment service providers in some circumstances such as when you ask us to share information about your account with them. Whilst those payment services regulations require your ‘consent’ for such disclosure, ‘consent’ in under such regulations does not have the same meaning as ‘consent’ under the Laws. The legal grounds which may be relevant to for our disclosure of your personal information with other payment service providers is compliance with our legal obligations, performance of our contract with you, our legitimate interests, or a combination of these. Therefore, if you ask to withdraw consent from what we do with your personal information where we need to share it with payment services providers, we may still have to hold and use your personal information in order to be able to provide our services to you and to comply with our legal obligations.
IS YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION TRANSFERRED OUTSIDE?
Sometimes, where we are able to do so in accordance with applicable Laws, your personal information may be transferred outside the Dubai International Financial Centre or the country from which you may be accessing our services. Some territories outside your country may not have adequate protection for personal information under the laws that apply to us. We will make sure that suitable safeguards are in place before we transfer your personal information to territories outside your country which do not have adequate protection under laws that apply to us; for example, by implementing specific contractual clauses with entities to whom we share your personal information.

For more information about suitable safeguards and (as relevant) how to obtain a copy of them or to find out where they have been made available you can contact us using the details provided in
below
.
WHAT SHOULD YOU DO IF YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION CHANGES?
You should tell us without delay so that we can update our records. If you were introduced to us by a broker or other intermediary who is data controller in its own right, you should contact them separately. In some cases where you exercise rights against us under the Laws (see below), under certain circumstances, we may need to inform the broker or other intermediary.
DO YOU HAVE TO PROVIDE YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION TO US?
We are unable to provide you with products and services or to process your application without having personal information about you. Your personal information is required before you can enter into the relevant contract with us, or it is required during the life of that contract, or it is required by laws that apply to us. If we already hold some of the personal information that we need – for instance if you are already a customer – we may not need to collect it again when you make your application.
DO WE DO ANY MONITORING INVOLVING PROCESSING OF YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION?
In this section monitoring means any listening to, recording of, viewing of, intercepting of, or taking and keeping records (as the case may be) of calls, email, text messages, social media messages, in person face to face meetings and other communications.

We may monitor where permitted by law and we will do this where the law requires it.

Some of our monitoring may be to comply with regulatory rules, self-regulatory practices or procedures relevant to our business, to prevent or detect crime, in the interests of protecting the security of our communications systems and procedures, to have a record of what we have discussed with you and actions agreed with you, to protect you and to provide security for you (such as in relation to fraud risks on your account) and for quality control and staff training purposes.

Some of our monitoring may check for obscene or profane content in communications.

We may conduct short term carefully controlled monitoring of your activities on your account(s) where this is necessary for our legitimate interests or to comply with our legal obligations. For instance, where we suspect fraud, money laundering or other crimes.

Telephone calls and/or in person meetings between us and you in connection with your application and/or your account(s) may be recorded to make sure that we have a record of what has been discussed and what your instructions are. We may also record these types of calls for the quality control and staff training purposes.
FOR HOW LONG IS YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION RETAINED BY US?
Unless we explain otherwise to you, we will hold your personal information as long as is necessary to respond to any queries from you, to improve our services, to respond to any legal claims by you, or to comply with any legal and/or regulatory requirements to which we are subject. To determine the appropriate retention period for personal information, we consider the amount, nature and sensitivity of the personal information, the potential risk of harm from unauthorised use or disclosure of your personal information, the purposes for which we process your personal information and whether we can achieve such purposes through other means, and the applicable requirements.
WHAT ARE YOUR RIGHTS UNDER DATA PROTECTION LAWS?
Under certain Laws, you may have the following rights:
The right to be informed about your processing of your personal information;
The right to have your personal information corrected if it is inaccurate and to have incomplete personal information completed;
The right to object to the processing of your personal information;
The right to have your personal information erased (the “right to blocking or erasure”);
The right to request access to your personal information and to obtain information about how we process it;
The right to restrict or limit the processing of your personal information;
The right to move, copy or transfer your personal information; or
Rights in relation to automated decision making which has a legal effect or otherwise significantly affects you.
For any of the above, you may raise a request using the link
here
. You can also email us at
DPO@Mashreq.com
or send postal mail to the following address:
Mashreqbank PSC, Attn: Customer Care Center, P.O. Box 1250, Dubai, UAE

If you are a customer of Mashreq Capital please send postal mail to Al Fattan Currency House, Tower 1, Floor 1, Office 111, Dubai International Financial Centre (DIFC), Post Box 1250, Dubai, UAE

We may require further information from you in order to carry out any of the above requests. We may ask you to provide proof of your identity.

If you wish to exercise any of these rights against the credit reference agencies, the fraud prevention agencies, or a broker or other intermediary who is data controller in its own right, you should contact them separately.
DATA ANONYMISATION AND USE OF AGGREGATED INFORMATION
Your personal information may be converted into statistical or aggregated data which cannot be used to re-identify you. It may then be used to produce statistical research and reports. This aggregated data may be shared and used in all the ways described in this Privacy Notice.
DATA PRIVACY NOTICES FROM OTHER ORGANISATIONS
We have mentioned that we share your personal information with fraud prevention agencies and credit reference agencies. They require us to pass on to your information about how they will use your personal information to perform their services or functions as data controllers. These notices are separate to our own.

All banking transactions requested by Mashreq customers are governed by our Terms and Conditions.

If you have any questions about our privacy practices write to us at
DPO@Mashreq.com
or Mashreqbank PSC, Attn: Customer Care Center, P.O. Box 1250, Dubai, UAE, or if you are a customer of Mashreq Capital to: Al Fattan Currency House, Tower 1, Floor 1, Office 111,Dubai International Financial Centre (DIFC),Post Box 1250, Dubai, UAE.
Did you find the information you were looking for on this page?
Yes
No
Sub-policy 5
https://surepay.nl/privacy-statement/:
Ga naar de inhoud
Privacy Statement
SurePay B.V. (SurePay) verwerkt persoonsgegevens. We verwerken persoonsgegevens omdat dit nodig is om de overeenkomst uit te voeren die jij en of wij met een bank of organisatie hebben gesloten. Bijvoorbeeld zodat wij de IBAN-Naam check kunnen uitvoeren voor jouw betaling of rekening. Wij willen jou hierover graag duidelijk en transparant informeren. In dit privacy statement leggen wij uit hoe SurePay omgaat met het verwerken van persoonsgegevens. Heb je vragen over dit privacy statement? Neem dan contact met ons op.
Wat is verwerken van persoonsgegevens?
Omdat we in dit privacy statement spreken over de verwerking van je persoonsgegevens, willen we je eerst laten weten wat we verstaan onder de termen ‘persoonsgegevens’, ‘verwerken’, ‘Verwerker’ en ‘Verwerkingsverantwoordelijke’.
Persoonsgegevens
Dit zijn gegevens die direct of indirect iets over jou zeggen. Denk aan je naam en IBAN (jouw rekeningnummer). Ook naamgegevens van een eenmanszaak, VOF of maatschap zijn persoonsgegevens. Dit geldt niet voor de gegevens van een rechtspersoon zoals een BV of NV. Gegevens van de contactpersoon of vertegenwoordiger van een rechtspersoon zijn dat weer wel.
Verwerken
Alles wat er met persoonsgegevens kan worden gedaan. Bijvoorbeeld het verzamelen, het opslaan, gebruiken, doorgeven en verwijderen van jouw gegevens.
Verwerker
Een Verwerker is een partij die (mogelijk namens een Verwerkingsverantwoordelijke) Persoonsgegevens verwerkt voor verscheidene doeleinden. In het geval van SurePay treedt SurePay op als Verwerker van uw Persoonsgegevens wanneer deze aan ons worden verstrekt ter controle ten behoeve van de SurePay checks.
Verwerkingsverantwoordelijke
Een Verwerkingsverantwoordelijke is de partij welke verantwoordelijk is voor de verwerking van uw Persoonsgegevens voor de relevante doeleinden waarvoor ze verzameld zijn. Het is mogelijk dat een Verwerkingsverantwoordelijke haar verwerkingen laat uitvoeren door Verwerkers, in dit geval blijft de Verwerkingsverantwoordelijke verantwoordelijk voor de verwerking. In het geval van SurePay treedt SurePay op als Verwerkingsverantwoordelijke wanneer SurePay Persoonsgegevens verwerkt om een SurePay check verzoek te beantwoorden. Een ander voorbeeld van een Verwerkingsverantwoordelijke is de partij van wie SurePay uw gegevens heeft ontvangen.
1. Van wie verwerken we persoonsgegevens?​
We verwerken jouw persoonsgegevens als we in opdracht van banken en organisaties een IBAN-Naam Check (via Portal), Cross-Border Check, 06Betalen en de OverstapCheck uitvoeren en terugkoppeling geven.
2. Wat verwacht SurePay van bedrijven en organisaties?
Geeft jouw bedrijf of organisatie persoonsgegevens van medewerkers of Uiteindelijk Belanghebbende (UBO) aan ons door? Dan verwachten wij dat je ook jouw medewerkers, bestuurders of UBO hierover informeert. Je kunt dit privacy statement aan hen geven. Zij kunnen dan zien hoe wij met hun persoonsgegevens omgaan.
3. Wie verwerkt jouw persoonsgegevens?
Dit Privacy Statement gaat over verwerkingen van persoonsgegevens door SurePay B.V. in Nederland.
4. Welke persoonsgegevens verwerken we?
5. Hoe komen we aan jouw persoonsgegevens?
We ontvangen jouw gegevens van banken en andere bedrijven om de IBAN-Naam Check (via Portal) Cross-Border Check, Overstap Check of 06Betalen te kunnen uitvoeren.
6. Waarvoor gebruiken we jouw persoonsgegevens?
In opdracht van anderen
Wij hebben jouw persoonsgegevens nodig om de IBAN-Naam Check (via Portal), Overstap Check of 06Betalen check te kunnen doen, maar ook omdat we wettelijk verplicht zijn om sommige gegevens te verwerken. We ontvangen jouw persoonsgegevens voor het beschermen van jouw veiligheid en de veiligheid van de financiële sector.
Voor het voorkomen van fraude, kunnen we op verzoek van banken en organisaties de IBAN-Naam Check uitvoeren. Hiermee controleren we of het IBAN nummer dat je hebt ingevuld bij een betaling via internetbankieren of mobiel bankieren overeenkomt met de bij ons bekende naam. De (IBAN/naam) gegevens die bij ons bekend zijn hebben wij verkregen van banken. Komt de bij ons bekende naam niet overeen met het nummer dat je hebt ingevoerd, dan ontvang je via jouw bank hierover een melding. Jij bepaalt vervolgens of je de betaalopdracht toch geeft of aanpast. We kunnen deze IBAN-Naam Check ook uitvoeren voor andere partijen in verband met het voorkomen, ontdekken en bestrijden van misbruik van het betalingsverkeer, onder andere door middel van het gebruik van een Portal.
Ook als je gebruik maakt van de Overstapservice kunnen we jouw gegevens verwerken. We melden aan banken en organisaties, en daarmee zij aan hun klanten, wat jouw nieuwe IBAN is. Zo kunnen de klanten van banken en organisatie direct overboeken naar jouw nieuwe IBAN. Hiermee worden fouten voorkomen.
Als je ook gebruik maakt van 06Betalen via jouw bank dan kunnen we jouw gegevens zoals het 06 nummer verwerken en sturen wij jouw IBAN terug voor het invullen van de betaalopdracht. Je hebt zelf dit IBAN doorgegeven en hiervoor akkoord gegeven aan jouw bank.
Bedrijven en organisaties gebruiken onze IBAN-Naam check om te controleren of de IBAN-Naam combinaties in hun klanten- en/of leveranciersadministratie overeenkomen met de gegevens die bekend zijn bij de bank. Zo weten zij aan wie ze betalen, bij wie ze incasseren en of IBAN en naam van nieuwe klanten of leveranciers bij elkaar horen.
Om je goed van dienst te kunnen zijn en te kunnen innoveren, ontwikkelen en verbeteren we producten en diensten voortdurend. Dit doen we voor onze klanten of andere partijen.
Voor het verbeteren van onze service of het oplossen van incidenten analyseren we de resultaten van onze IBAN-Naam Check, Overstap Check, 06Betalen check en toekomstige services. Deze analyses koppelen we vervolgens terug aan de betreffende banken of organisaties.
Om overeenkomsten met leveranciers en andere partijen waar we mee samenwerken aan te gaan en uit te voeren
Als je voor je werk contact hebt met SurePay, kunnen we jouw persoonsgegevens verwerken. Bijvoorbeeld om vast te kunnen stellen of je jouw bedrijf mag vertegenwoordigen. Of om met je te kunnen mailen of bellen.
Om te voldoen aan wetgeving
De belastingdienst, de politie en het openbaar ministerie, maar bijvoorbeeld ook inlichtingendiensten kunnen gegevens bij ons opvragen. Als dat kan, verwijzen wij deze partijen naar jouw bank. Maar soms hebben wij de wettelijke verplichting mee te werken aan onderzoeken en gegevens over jou door te geven.
Gegevens verstrekken aan de overheid
Wet- en regelgeving kan ons er ook toe verplichten om (geanalyseerde) gegevens over jou aan een overheidsinstelling, een belastingautoriteit of aan een toezichthouder binnen of buiten Nederland door te geven. Als dat mogelijk is, verwijzen wij deze partijen naar jouw bank. Omdat we moeten voldoen aan wettelijke verplichtingen en verdragen, moeten we soms gegevens van je verstrekken aan de Nederlandse of een buitenlandse belastingautoriteit.
Audits en onderzoeken
We gebruiken jouw gegevens ook als er door derden in- en externe audits bij SurePay worden gedaan. Of als een derde partij die wij inschakelen en om onderzoeken te doen, bijvoorbeeld om te onderzoeken of nieuwe regels goed zijn ingevoerd. Of om risico’s in kaart te brengen.
7. Hoe lang bewaren we je persoonsgegevens?
We bewaren jouw gegevens niet langer dan we hebben afgesproken met de banken en organisaties namens wie wij jouw gegevens verwerken en noodzakelijk is voor het uitvoeren van onze services. We hanteren een bewaarbeleid. Daarin is vastgesteld hoe lang we gegevens bewaren. In het algemeen geldt dat wij de gegevens niet langer dan 30 dagen bewaren. Soms is deze termijn langer. Soms hanteren we kortere bewaartermijnen.
8. Verwerkt SurePay ook bijzondere persoonsgegevens, strafrechtelijke gegevens en BSN?
Bijzondere persoonsgegevens, strafrechtelijke gegevens en het BSN zijn gevoelige gegevens. Bijzondere persoonsgegevens zijn bijvoorbeeld gegevens over je gezondheid, biometrische gegevens, etnische gegevens of gegevens betreffende ras. SurePay verwerkt geen bijzondere persoonsgegevens.
9. Neemt SurePay automatische besluiten over mij?
Automatische besluiten zijn beslissingen over jou die gemaakt worden door computers, en niet (meer) door mensen. SurePay mag van de wet gebruik maken van geautomatiseerde beslissingen inclusief profilering. Maar daar gelden wel bepaalde regels voor. Op dit moment maakt SurePay geen gebruik van volledig automatische besluitvorming. Gaan wij dit wel doen, dan word je hierover geïnformeerd.
10. Wie heeft toegang tot jouw gegevens?
Binnen SurePay hebben alleen personen toegang tot jouw persoonsgegevens die deze gelet op hun functie nodig hebben. Al deze personen hebben een geheimhoudingsplicht.
11. Geven we jouw persoonsgegevens aan anderen en aan andere landen buiten de EU door?
Jouw gegevens kunnen ook worden doorgegeven aan andere partijen buiten SurePay als we daar wettelijk toe verplicht zijn, omdat we een overeenkomst met jou moeten uitvoeren of omdat we een andere dienstverlener inzetten. Dit kan betekenen dat jouw gegevens doorgegeven worden aan andere partijen in landen die niet hetzelfde beschermingsniveau van persoonsgegevens hebben als de Europese Unie. Worden jouw persoonsgegevens verwerkt in een land met een ander beschermingsniveau? Dan kan dit bijvoorbeeld tot gevolg hebben dat jouw persoonsgegevens voorwerp zijn van onderzoek door bevoegde nationale autoriteiten van de landen waar dergelijke gegevens zich bevinden.
Soms schakelen we andere partijen/zakelijke partners in die in onze opdracht persoonsgegevens verwerken. SurePay gebruikt bijvoorbeeld AWS Cloud Services. Deze partijen moeten eerst door ons voldoende betrouwbaar worden geacht. We kunnen alleen andere partijen inschakelen als dit past bij het doel waarvoor we jouw persoonsgegevens hebben verwerkt. Daarnaast kan deze andere partij alleen onze opdracht krijgen als hij bepaalde afspraken met ons maakt en aantoonbaar passende beveiligingsmaatregelen heeft genomen en geheimhouding garandeert.
Als we jouw gegevens zelf doorgeven aan andere partijen buiten de Europese Unie (EU)/ Europees Economische Ruimte (EER), nemen we extra maatregelen om je gegevens te beschermen. Niet in alle landen buiten de EU gelden dezelfde regels om jouw gegevens te beschermen zoals dat binnen Europa verplicht is. Gebruiken we derde partijen buiten de EU/EER? En biedt het land waar deze partij zich bevindt volgens de Europese Commissie onvoldoende bescherming bij de verwerking van persoonsgegevens? Dan geven we alleen persoonsgegevens door als er andere passende waarborgen zijn, zoals door de Europese Commissie goedgekeurde contractuele afspraken.
12 . Welke rechten heb jij?
a. recht op informatie
Met dit Privacy Statement informeren we je over wat we doen met jouw gegevens.
b. recht op inzage en rectificatie
Je kunt bij ons vragen welke gegevens van jou worden verwerkt. Vind je dat jouw persoonsgegevens onjuist of onvolledig zijn verwerkt? Dan kun je bij ons vragen om de gegevens te wijzigen of aan te vullen (rectificatie). Jouw bank verwerkt ook jouw gegevens. Je kunt ook bij jouw bank vragen om inzage en rectificatie. Kijk hiervoor in het privacy statement van jouw bank.
c. recht op gegevenswissing
Je kunt bij ons vragen om gegevens die we van jou hebben vastgelegd te laten wissen. Jouw bank verwerkt ook jouw gegevens. Je kunt ook bij jouw bank vragen om gegevenswissing van de gegevens die zij verwerken. Kijk hiervoor in het privacy statement van jouw bank.
d. recht op beperking
Je kunt bij ons vragen om de persoonsgegevens die we van jou verwerken tijdelijk te beperken. Jouw bank verwerkt ook jouw gegevens. Je kunt ook bij jouw bank vragen om de gegevensverwerking te beperken van de gegevens die zij verwerken. Kijk hiervoor in het privacy statement van jouw bank.
e. recht van bezwaar tegen verwerking van gegevens
Verwerken we jouw gegevens omdat we daar een gerechtvaardigd belang bij hebben? Dan kun je daar bezwaar tegen maken. We maken dan een nieuwe afweging om te bepalen of jouw gegevens daar inderdaad niet meer voor gebruikt mogen worden. We staken de verwerking als jouw belang zwaarder weegt dan ons belang. We laten je gemotiveerd weten wat onze beslissing is.
13. Hoe maak je gebruik van je rechten?
Als je een verzoek hebt kan dit gemaakt worden digitaal aan
privacy@surepay.nl
. Heb je een verzoek aan ons gedaan? En betreft dit de gegevens die wij van je verwerken? Dan zullen we dit binnen één maand nadat we het verzoek hebben ontvangen beantwoorden.
We kunnen je vragen jouw verzoek om inzage verder te preciseren. In zeer specifieke gevallen kunnen we de termijn waarbinnen we reageren verlengen tot maximaal drie maanden. We houden je dan op de hoogte over de voortgang van je verzoek.
Het kan zijn dat we niet aan jouw verzoek tegemoetkomen. Bijvoorbeeld omdat jouw verzoek ziet op verwerkingen door jouw eigen bank, omdat dan de rechten van anderen worden geschaad, of omdat dit niet mag van de wet of de politie, het openbaar ministerie of een andere overheidsinstantie. Of omdat we een belangenafweging hebben gemaakt waarbij het belang van SurePay of anderen om de gegevens te verwerken voorgaat. Dan laten we je dat ook weten. Passen we jouw gegevens aan? Of wissen we je gegevens op jouw verzoek? Dan laten we dit weten. En daar waar mogelijk informeren we ook de ontvangers van jouw gegevens hierover.
Het is ook mogelijk dat we met betrekking tot jouw verzoek een referentie maken naar de respectievelijke Data Provider. Dit betekend dat het zou kunnen zijn dat wij niet aan je verzoek kunnen voldoen, maar dat we denken dat de bank of organisatie die jouw data levert dat wel kan. We informeren je dan zo goed mogelijk over je rechten, hoe we data gebruiken, en wie ons jouw data levert. Is het zo dat zij jou niet verder kunnen helpen? Dan kijken we nogmaals wat we kunnen doen.
14. Heb je een klacht over de verwerking van je persoonsgegevens?
Wij willen graag dat je tevreden bent over onze dienstverlening. Toch loopt het soms anders. Dit vinden wij erg vervelend. Neem
contact
met ons op en laat ons weten wat je klacht is, dan zoeken we samen naar een oplossing.
15. Waar kan ik de functionaris gegevensbescherming voor benaderen?
Mocht je ontevreden zijn over de manier waarop je verzoek of klacht door SurePay is afgehandeld, of heb je na het lezen van het Privacy Statement nog vragen over de verwerking van je persoonsgegevens door SurePay dan kan je contact opnemen met
de functionaris gegevensbescherming
.
Uiteraard kan je ook vragen stellen of een klacht indienen bij de
Autoriteit Persoonsgegevens
.
16. Kunnen we dit Privacy Statement wijzigen?
Ja, ons Privacy Statement kan van tijd tot tijd wijzigen. Dit kan als er nieuwe gegevensverwerkingen zijn en deze wijzigingen voor jou van belang zijn. We houden je daar uiteraard van op de hoogte. De meest actuele versie van ons Privacy Statement kun je steeds terugvinden op:
https://surepay.nl/privacy-statement/
Sub-policy 6
https://www.network.ae/en/contents/view/privacy-notice:
Privacy
Notice
Introduction
This Privacy Notice sets out the basis on which any Personal Information
                            Network collects, uses, shares and otherwise processes. Please read the following carefully
                            to understand Network’s views and practices regarding Personal Information and how Network
                            will treat it. By accessing and using Network Services, including Network’s interactions
                            with you via our websites (including but not limited to www.network.ae), mobile sites and
                            applications (“Sites”), you agree to the transfer, storing and processing of Personal
                            Information as set out in this Privacy Notice.
Definitions
“Card” When Network uses the word ‘card’ in this notice, it applies to all
                            payment methods and types and not simply those involving a physical card; and use of the
                            term ‘cardholder’ applies to any shopper or individual whose payment transactions may be
                            processed.
“Network” means Network International Holdings Plc., Network International LLC any of its
                            subsidiaries or affiliates.
“Network Services” means the products and services which are being offered by Network.
"Personal Information or Personal Data" for purposes of this Policy means to any information
                            relating to an identified or identifiable individual.
You are important
At Network our most important asset is you and your trust. In this Privacy
                            Policy we will cover what and how we collect, use, disclose, transfer, and store your
                            information.
We want to assure you that Network is committed to maintaining the confidentiality,
                            integrity and security of any Personal Information about our users. This Privacy Policy will
                            explain to you what and how we collect, use, disclose, transfer, and store your non-personal
                            and Personal Information shared through our Sites or in connection with our Services.
It is not mandatory for you to provide the Personal Information that we have requested, but,
                            if you choose not to do so, unfortunately, we will not be able to provide you with our
                            Services or respond to any queries you may have.
Principles of Data Processing
Network shall apply the following principles when processing your Personal
                            Information:
1. Lawfulness, fairness and transparency: All Personal Information will processed fairly,
                            transparently and in compliance with applicable laws.
2. Purpose: Any Personal Information collected will be used for a stated purpose.
3. Data Minimization: Network will collect only the Personal Information that is adequate
                            and relevant to the purposes for which it is collected.
4. Accuracy: Network will keep the Personal Information accurate and, where necessary, kept
                            up to date information.
5. Storage Limitation: Personal Information will be stored with Network for a defined period
                            as per its policy or applicable law.
6. Integrity and Confidentiality: Network will implement appropriate technical,
                            organizational and physical security measures to protect Personal Information.
7. Accountability: Network will maintain applicable records, logs when dealing with Personal
                            Information.
What kind of Personal Information do we collect?
Network collects Personal Information relating to cardholders, merchants or
                            other customers, suppliers and other business partners in order to carry out its business
                            activities. Network may collect Personal Information from various sources, including:
Information you voluntarily provide, either directly or via our customers;
Information automatically collected when you use our Sites and Services, including in
                                our role as a payment processor;
Information collected by cookies and other tracking technologies when you use our Sites;
This Personal Information may include:
Contact information, Demographic information, Identification information, Payment
                            transaction information, Financial and credit card information, Technical information,
                            Social media posts, Applications (including job applications)
Non-Personal Information.
We also collect information in a form that does not, on its own, permit direct association
                            with any specific individual such as occupation, language, zip/area code, location, time
                            zone, etc. We may collect, use, transfer, and disclose non-personal information for any
                            purpose. This information is aggregated and used to help us provide more useful information
                            to our customers and to understand which portions of Services are of most interest. This
                            aggregated data is considered non personal information for the purposes of this Privacy
                            Notice.
How do we use your Personal Information?
Network uses Personal Information internally in relation to:
1. Conduct its Operations, Risk Management, Transaction Processing, Marketing, development
                            of existing and new Products and for Legal, compliance, regulatory or law enforcement
                            purposes.
2. Online Session Information and Use is Collected to Improve Your Experience
We may also collect technical and navigational related Personal Information, such as computer
                            browser type, Internet protocol address, pages visited, and average time spent on our Site.
                            This Personal Information may be used, for example, to alert you to software compatibility
                            issues, or it may be analyzed to improve our design and functionality of the Network Sites
                            and the Services.
We Use Cookies and other technologies to improve your Experience
We may use cookies and similar technologies to help us better understand user behavior, tell
                            us which parts of Network Sites people have visited, and facilitate and measure the
                            effectiveness of offer and Services and improve them.
We treat the information received from cookies and other technologies as non-personal
                            information.
You will have the option to disable cookies. If you choose to do so, unfortunately, certain
                            features of the Network website and the Services will not be available once cookies are
                            disabled.
Some web browsers may send out ‘do not track’ signals. There is no industry standard
                            currently in place as to what websites and other online services should do upon receipt of
                            such signals. Should such a standard be developed, Network will re-visit its notice, but
                            currently takes no action upon receipt of such signals.
Network may offer certain features that are only available through the use of tracking
                            technologies. Temporary cookies are used to enable you to navigate our site and use its
                            features. These are deleted when you close your browser. IP addresses are used in
                            conjunction with cookies for the purpose of “remembering” computers or other devices used to
                            access our Sites.
Analytical or performance cookies collect anonymous information about how visitors use our
                            websites. They allow us to analyse information such as the count of visitors to our
                            websites, what search terms our visitors are using, what pages are viewed, and the last page
                            visited. This information is based on the visitor’s IP address, and we cannot view
                            individual activity tied to a single person.
To the extent that Internet Protocol (IP) addresses (or similar identifiers) are clearly
                            defined to be Personal Information under any local law and where such local law is
                            applicable to Network Services, Network will manage such identifiers as Personal
                            Information.
Network Sites may also contain links to and from third party websites, including those of
                            partner networks, advertisers and affiliates. Please note that these websites may have their
                            own privacy notices and cookies policies, and Network does not accept any responsibility or
                            liability for these third party websites. The inclusion of links to third party websites in
                            no way constitutes an endorsement by us of such websites’ content, actions, or policies.
How We Use Anonymized Data: Peer Comparisons, Research & Development
Network may make anonymous or aggregate Personal Information and disclose such data only in a
                            non-personally identifiable manner to:
(i) advertising, measurement or analytics partners approved by Network that conduct research
                            into consumer spending;
(ii) deliver products and services to other clients; and
(iii) Users of the Service for purposes of comparison of their financial situation relative
                            to the broader community.
With whom does Network share Personal Information and for what purposes?
Before we share Personal Information, we ensure there are adequate safeguards in place to
                            protect the processing of that data. Network does not disclose information that could
                            identify you personally to anyone, except as described in this notice, including, but not
                            limited to:
Any Network group company;
Any group company (such as advisers, share plan, payroll and other third party
                                administrators, agents or contractors working on behalf of Network);
Financial institution clients;
Service providers and other third parties under contract who help with our business
                                operations (including, but not limited to, fraud investigations, site analytics and
                                operations);
Regulatory, legal and judicial authorities;
Social media sites integrated into web services that we offer;
Governmental or quasi-governmental organizations; and
Potential purchasers of Network.
Network may disclose Personal Information to third parties for the following purposes:
Legal or regulatory purposes
Business purposes
Suppliers who assist Network with the provision of its Services
Information on cross-border data transfers
Network International Holdings Plc., has its headquarters in London, United Kingdom. Network
                            International LLC, a subsidiary of Network International Holdings Plc., has it registered
                            office in Dubai, UAE. Network has offices and operations in other countries including Egypt,
                            South Africa, Jordan, Saudi Arabia, and Nigeria. The data Network collects from you may be
                            transferred, stored and processed in a country different from where the data was
                            collected.
By using our Network Sites and Services, you are permitting Network (or its authorized
                            service providers) to process, store and transfer Personal Information to a country which is
                            different from where the data was collected. The transfer of information will often be in
                            furtherance of a contract to which you or your bank/merchant are a party. In other cases,
                            the transfer of information will be consistent with the legitimate interests of conducting
                            Network Services.
Individual’s Privacy Rights (data subject rights)
Certain laws and regulations give individual data subject rights in relation to their
                            Personal Information (for example, the right to access that data, to rectify inaccurate
                            data, or to erase Personal Information). In certain circumstances, data subjects may have
                            such rights in respect of the Personal Information processed by Network. In such
                            circumstances, where a request to exercise such a right is received by Network, it must be
                            forwarded to
privacy@network.global
so that it can be
                            handled in accordance with applicable laws and statutory timeframes.
How do we keep your Personal Information safe and secure?
We are bound by our Group Policies
Our employees are committed to maintain the highest data protection standards by complying
                            with this Privacy Notice and our other policies including our Code of Conduct and Group Data
                            Protection Policy. The Board Audit and Technology Committee has the overall responsibility
                            to review the adequacy and effectiveness of the Group Data Protection Policy, ensure
                            compliance with the same, and review and approve changes to the said Policy wherever
                            considered appropriate.
All our employees receive trainings on these important requirements at least annually.
We Are Committed To Keeping Your Personal Information Secure
The security of your Personal Information is important to us. As discussed below, we utilize
                            physical, electronic and procedural security measures to protect against loss, misuse, and
                            alteration of Personal Information under our control. We adhere to industry standard
                            practices and security measures and our practices are independently validated annually
                            enabling us to comply with ISO 27001 and PCI-DSS standards to safeguard and secure the
                            information we collect.
No method of transmission over the Internet, or method of electronic storage, is completely
                            secure. Therefore, we cannot guarantee its absolute security. Any transmission is at your
                            own risk.
We use a combination of firewall barriers, encryption techniques and authentication
                            procedures, among others, to maintain the security of your online in-app session and to
                            protect Network accounts and systems from unauthorized access. Our servers are in a secure
                            facility. Access requires multiple levels of authentication. Security personnel monitor the
                            system 7 days a week, 24 hours a day.
We Enforce Physical Access Controls to Our Facilities
No employee may put any Personal Information or account Personal Information on any insecure
                            machine (i.e., nothing can be taken from the database and put on an insecure laptop). In
                            addition, Network frequently tests the Service for any failure points that would allow
                            hacking.
However, it is important to understand that these precautions apply only to our Service and
                            systems. We exercise no control over how your Personal Information is stored, maintained or
                            displayed by third parties or on third-party sites.
Our Service Ensures Secure Communications with Encryption
From the time you submit your login ID and password so that communications between your
                            device and Network are encrypted. This enables client and server applications to communicate
                            in a way that is designed to prevent eavesdropping, tampering and message forgery.
You are responsible for keeping your login ID, password, mobile device, and email account
                            safe and confidential.
You also agree that you control and limit access to the email account and mobile device. If
                            your email address or your mobile device changes, you are responsible for informing us of
                            that change.
We are not responsible if someone else accesses your account through Registration
                            Information they have obtained from you or through a violation by you of this Privacy Notice
                            or the Terms of Use.
Restrictions and Monitoring of Our Partners and third parties
Any partners we work with have been selected in accordance with our security and risk
                            management policies and practices and are bound by contractual obligations which includes
                            compliance with Network policies and requirements relating to confidentiality, privacy and
                            security. They may be subject to discipline, including termination and criminal prosecution,
                            if they fail to meet these obligations.
We may also use third party vendors or service providers to help us provide the Service to
                            you, such as sending e-mail messages on our behalf or hosting and operating a particular
                            feature or functionality of the Service. We require such third parties to maintain the
                            confidentiality of the Personal Information we provide to them.
How long does Network store and retain Personal Information?
Network will store Personal Information only for the greater of as long as necessary to
                            achieve the purposes for which it was collected and applicable law. Retention periods for
                            transaction and other data categories may vary, depending on our obligations. For example,
                            legal and regulatory compliance with anti-money laundering (AML) and KYC requirements,
                            operational demands, business requirements or dates we assigned based on contracts will also
                            need to be taken into account, and may require retention for a period of up to 7 years after
                            the data was collected or after the merchant or other customer relationship has ended.
What happens in case of a data breach?
In case Network is faced with a breach of Personal Information, Network shall inform the
                            relevant authorities and the data subjects where required by applicable law and shall take
                            necessary steps to mitigate the impact of such breach.
Changes and updates to the privacy notice
Network may, from time to time, make changes to this Privacy Notice. If any material changes
                            are made as to how Network treat Personal Information, you will be notified through this
                            notice on Network’s Sites.
The date the Privacy Notice was last modified is at the bottom of the page. You are
                            responsible for ensuring you periodically visit our Sites to check for any changes. By
                            continuing to use Network Services or the Sites, you agree to the changes in this Privacy
                            Notice.
This notice is global in scope, but is not intended to override any legal rights in any
                            territory where such rights prevail. In such event, the rights and obligations set out in
                            this Privacy Policy will apply, subject only to amendment under any applicable local law
                            having precedence.
Questions
We have appointed Amit Khandelwal as the Group Data Protection Officer (DPO). If you have questions, comments, concerns or feedback regarding this Privacy Notice or any other privacy concern, contact DPO at
privacy@network.global
or call us at
+971 4075863
.
Last modified: 25 September 2024
Sub-policy 7
https://www.vivawallet.com/privacy-policy:
You must enable JavaScript to use this page
You're on the English website. Choose your country to see location-specific content
Europe
English
Link to the homepage
Products
Businesses we serve
Partner solutions
Resources
Pricing
About
Create account
Login
Link to the homepage
Open the main menu
Personal Data Processing Notice
History
2024
2023
2022
2018
This Privacy Notice sets out how
VIVA BANK
("Viva", "we", "us") processes the personal data of website visitors and app users, our customers or prospect customers, guarantors or persons that could provide us any guarantee, suppliers/ partners and their staff and any other contacts (together,
“you”
). This Privacy Notice includes a description of your data protection rights. For the purposes of this notice, personal data shall mean any information relating to you which identifies or may identify you and which includes, for example, your name, address and your identification number.
Please read this Privacy Notice carefully.
1. Types of personal data we collect
We collect, use and otherwise process:
• Information you provide to us (e.g. when you create an account with us, submit information via forms on our website or app, use our services or apps, provide your preferences for receiving information and marketing information in hard-copy and electronically (such as post, email and SMS), take part in surveys, questionnaires and other market research activities and contact us);
• Information we create about you (e.g. in our customer and supplier management systems) and
• Website and app usage information [such as information about the device you use to access the website or app, the operating system you use, the type and version of your browser, connection information (such as IP addresses), and information about your use of the website and apps (such as the links that you click, how long you remain on the website, and any errors that may occur on the website or app)]. We collect this information using cookies and other technologies – see section 3 below.
• Where we need to collect your personal data to comply with our legal obligations, or to perform a contract we have with you, this is mandatory and we will not be able to perform the contract we have or are trying to enter into with you (for example, to provide you with our products or services) and we may have to terminate the provision of products or services, decline the requested performance of a task or we may be prevented from complying with our legal obligations to you or third parties without this information.
• Identification information, including data we collect during the remote onboarding process or in the context of due diligence and anti-money laundering processes (such as name, copies of identification documents, tax identification number, proof of address, business documentation and information, biometric data contained or extracted from video or image);
• Contact information (e.g. postal address, telephone number, email address);
• Financial and transaction information (e.g. amount of funds owned, details of the products and services you receive from us, number, validity and expiration date of debit/credit/prepaid card, transaction information, details of cheques, loan agreements, due amounts, loan requests or other credit facilities, credit worthiness data, details of your order, amount payable, payment account details as well as beneficiary details, information for the safeguarding against criminal activities, fraud or money laundering or combat against financial and electronic crime, confiscation documents);
• Marketing and communications data (e.g. your preferences for receiving promotional communications from us, your communication preferences, call recordings).
2. Third Party Sources
We receive personal data about you from third parties as defined below:
i. Our applications, when you are making use of them
ii. The applications and other documents you submit to us
iii. Our social media, when you are connected as a user
iv. Payment service providers you use to transfer money to us
v. Banking institutions where your account is linked to the account you have created with us
vi. Information providers to ensure the legality and accuracy of the corresponding data, such as providers carrying out credit checks, such as credit worthiness information providers, public authorities, referral companies, companies processing card payments
vii. Other data providers, who also ensure as well the legality and accuracy of the data provided to us, such as business registries.
3. Cookies
We use cookies and similar technologies in connection with our website and app. To learn more about how we use these technologies, please refer to
our cookie policy
.
4. How we use personal data and our lawful basis
We are committed to protecting your privacy and handling your data in a transparent manner. We process your personal data for the purposes and lawful bases set out below:
I. To comply with legal and regulatory obligations applicable to us
We collect and process personal data and information necessary to provide our services and to comply with certain legal and regulatory requirements we are subject to as a Data Controller and obligations arising from the laws applicable to us. These include:
i. using your personal information to validate and authenticate your identity
ii. using personal information needed to comply with legal and regulator duties related to anti-money laundering and counter-terrorism financing
iii. detecting, preventing, reporting and prosecuting fraud or theft, as well as preventing illegitimate or prohibited use of our services or other illegal or wrongful activity
iv. keeping records of information we hold about you in line with legal and regulatory requirements
v. making legally required disclosures to regulatory, prosecuting, tax or governmental authorities, courts or other tribunals
vi. communicating with you when required by applicable laws and regulations
vii. adhering to laws and regulations applicable to the organisation, including where necessary, disclosure of customer details with regulators, tax or governmental authorities, law enforcement and courts or other third parties.
II. In order to pursue our and third-party legitimate interests where these interests are not overridden by your data protection rights
We process personal data as necessary for the legitimate interests pursued by us or by third parties. There is a legitimate interest when we have a business or commercial reason for using your information. This includes:
i. to provide the website and app and the functionalities on the website and app;
ii. to handle and respond to queries, comments, complaints and other communications you send us;
iii. in order to protect and enforce the rights, property or safety of us, our business, our clients or others, i.e. concerning our premises;
iv. in relation to the establishment, exercise or defence legal claims and proceedings, including among others, to meet obligations and disclosure requirements or requests of any regulatory, prosecuting, tax or governmental authorities, courts or other tribunals as is deemed appropriate or in respect of any laws applicable in other jurisdictions;
v. to ensure and maintain the security of our website and app, products, services and systems; vi. for system administration, operation, testing and technical support;
vii. to prevent possible criminal activity and to prevent and detect fraud;
viii. to understand how visitors engage with our website and app, products and services, to monitor, improve and optimise the performance of our website and app, products and services and to inform the development and expansion of our products, services and business activities; ix. to send you marketing information about our products and services that we think may be of interest to you and market research and surveys (except where we require consent for this);
x. to carry out market research and other surveys;
xi. to identify and manage financial, regulatory and reputational risk;
xii. to monitor and record calls and electronic communications with you or our clients (for quality, training, investigation and fraud prevention purposes and for dealing with complaints).
III. Based on your consent
If you give us your consent to process your personal data, our processing is based on that consent. We obtain your consent:
i. to send you direct marketing about our products and services and to invite you to participate in market research and surveys, where we are legally required to and
ii. when we use cookies or similar technologies for the purposes explained in
our policy on cookies.
You have the right to withdraw your consent at any time. However, any processing of personal data prior your withdrawal will not be affected.
IV. In order to fulfil a contract, or take steps linked to a contract where we have a contract with you We process personal data in order to complete your account registration, notify you of pending steps regarding the account authentication process, to deliver products and services to our clients and to otherwise perform our obligations under our contract with you.
5. Sharing with third parties
In the course of the performance of our contractual and statutory obligations, your personal data may be provided to various departments within VIVA.COM but also to other companies of the VIVA group. Your personal data will be shared with various service providers and suppliers in order to perform our obligations and provide our services.
Additionally, we may disclose data about you if we are legally required to do so, or if we are authorized under our contractual and statutory obligations if it is necessary for the purposes of the legitimate interests pursued by us or if you have given your consent.
All data processors appointed by us to process personal data on our behalf are bound by contract to comply with the provisions of the General Data Protection Regulation and the applicable laws.
Recipients of personal data may be, for example:
I. Viva group entities and subsidiaries;
II. Official, national or foreign, government, state, law enforcement, regulatory and supervisory bodies or authorities (e.g. the police, supervisory authorities and international tax authorities) when we are required by law, when requested and in order to prevent any unlawful actions (e.g. fraud or money laundering);
III. Business partners, professional consultants, suppliers and subcontractors for the performance of any contract we enter into with them or with you, including, for example:
• Identity verification service providers and KYC service providers
• Analytics providers and search engine providers
• Contact Center Service Providers
• Document transport and delivery companies
• Card manufacturing and delivery companies, as well as bill, statements of loans and other accounts issuing companies
• Debtor information companies, legally licensed, regarding arrears and overdue debts,
• Companies acquiring receivables, special purpose companies operating for securitization purposes, companies in the financial sector in case of assignment of claims of the Bank arising from credit or other agreements between the Bank and you, as well as their advisors, suppliers, as appropriate
• Interbanking systems service providers, other credit institutions and payment service providers for the provision of services, including the execution of payment orders from a held account with a third party payment service provider
• Banking and financial services partners and payments networks, including Visa and Mastercard
• IT, data hosting and storage providers, cloud services (including cloud storage companies) and software providers, file management, storage and digitization companies
• Lawyers, legal advisors, notaries and bailiffs
• Consultancy firms
• Insurers, Accounting providers, Certified Accountants, financial advisors, auditing firms or external auditors for executing audit functions
• Data reporting providers
• Cyber security and fraud prevention providers
• Advertising and marketing support providers
• Social media companies
• Credit reference agencies.
IV. In the event that we sell any of our business or assets or combine with another organisation, in which case we may disclose your personal data to the prospective buyer of such business or assets or prospective organisation with which our business or assets may be combined.
V. Any other third parties to the extent such disclosure is required under law or where this is necessary in order to provide you with services.
We have concluded agreements with our service providers to protect your personal data. We require all third parties to respect the security of your personal data and to treat it in accordance with the law.
We may transfer your personal data to countries outside the EEA or UK based on one of the following criteria
I. EU adequacy decisions for data transfers,
II. UK adequacy regulations and decisions for data transfers,
III. binding corporate rules,
IV. EU SCC’s (Standard Contractual Clauses) for data transfers
V. the International Data Transfer Agreement or Addendum to the EU Commission standard contractual clauses issued by the Information Commissioner,
VI. approved codes of conduct.
If we transfer your personal data to another country that does not offer a standard of data protection equivalent to the United Kingdom or EEA, we will make sure that your personal data is sufficiently protected and that strict data protection safeguards is in place before we transfer your personal data.
6. Hyperlinks to websites of third parties
VIVA’s websites and apps may contain hyperlinks that lead to other websites of third parties that we do not control.
We have no responsibility for the content, activities or the policies of such websites. Please carefully read the privacy notices of the websites you visit.
7. Data retention
We will retain your personal data only for as long as is necessary to fulfil the purposes for which we collected it. Retention periods are determined based on the type of record, the nature of the activity, product or service and the applicable legal or regulatory requirements.
Therefore, your personal data is retained for at least five years from the end of your relationship with us, unless such retention period is exceeded, as necessary, in order to:
• comply with our legal and regulatory obligations including anti-money laundering and applicable compliance framework.
• establish, exercise or support our legal claims.
8. Information on automated decision-making
We may process your data based on automated decision making, including profiling. This means that we may use technology that can evaluate your personal circumstances and other factors to predict risks or outcomes. We do this for the efficient running of our services and to ensure decisions are fair, consistent and based on the right information. For example, we may make automated decisions about you that relate to due diligence and anti-money laundering processes and checks, credit worthiness information, as well as monitoring your account to detect fraud and financial crime.
We will retain your personal data only for as long as is necessary to fulfil the purposes for which we collected it. Retention periods are determined based on the type of record, the nature of the activity, product or service and the applicable local legal or regulatory requirements.
9. Your data protection rights
You have the following rights in relation to the personal data we process about you:
I. Access to your personal data;
II. Rectify or correct your personal data;
III. Erasure of your personal data (also known as “right to be forgotten”);
IV. Object to the processing of your personal data in some circumstances (in particular, where we do not have to process the data to meet a contractual or other legal requirement, or where we are using the data for direct marketing purposes);
V. Restrict the processing of your personal data, in cases where either their accuracy is contested, the processing is unlawful, or the data are no longer necessary in relation to the purposes for which they were processed and provided that there is no legitimate reason for retaining the data and
VI. Obtain the personal data you provide to us for a contract or with your consent in a structured, machine-readable format and to ask us to share (port) this data to another party (known as right to “data portability”).
The above rights may be limited, for example if fulfilling your request would reveal personal data about another person, where they would infringe the rights of a third party (including our rights) or if you ask us to delete information which we are required by law to keep or have compelling legitimate interests in keeping. Relevant exemptions are included in data protection laws. We will inform you of relevant exemptions we rely upon when responding to any request you make.
You also have the right to withdraw your consent to the processing of your personal data at any time where we have asked for your consent. Any withdrawal of consent does not affect the legality of the consent-based processing before it was withdrawn by you. In order to exercise any of your rights or if you have any other questions regarding how we use your personal data, you may contact us by email at
dpo@viva.com
or by mail at 18-20, Amaroussiou – Chalandriou street, 15125, Maroussi, Attica, Greece.
10. Right to lodge a complaint
We hope we can address any queries or issues you have in respect of your personal data. If you have any unresolved concerns, you have the right to lodge a complaint to the Hellenic Data Protection Authority.
11. Updates to this Privacy Notice
This Privacy Notice is subject to updates and such updates will be published on this website / app. We may also notify you in other ways from time to time about the processing of your personal data.
Create account